I find this a hell lot more satisfying ;)   powerpill -Syu
My impression from watching the Academy Awards was that they only considered like twelve movies for all the awards.  So lame.  I regret watching almost as much as Gwyneth Paltrow regrets singing!
The flying people get me every time.
I find his latest antics funnier than anything I saw on two and a half men
Abundance mentality is the attitude that no girl is a big deal because you can meet another one like her in no time. This attitude makes your time seem more scarce to the girl and puts you in the ideal position to seduce.   Abundance also means that you surround yourself with girls. This second part of abundance gives you preselection and social proof.
&gt; She attempted to catch the ball after it jumped off the end of the track but missed and it went directly down her shit.  &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
Wasn't there some guy who asked this same question a few months ago regarding Oblivion? And the result was mega lolz at his expense?
If I were you I would get Uncharted 2 now and try to find Uncharted 1 somewhere else. I bet you can find a used copy pretty cheap and the other two games should keep you busy long enough while you search. Personally, I hated Infamous. My .02
Theres only two reasons to bring back that show.  Those being Jewel Staite and Summer Glau.  If you dont bring back those two specific actresses back, people simply wont watch it.  It would actually be better if Joss wasnt involved, because he's run out of ideas for sci-fi and more or less wants to do broadway shows. 
Pretty much. It's almost impossible to put your skis on on a steep slope and/or in very deep snow. Also, if they came off, you would probably never get them back. 
The beer doesn't represent income in this story.  The beer represents goods and services which come from tax money.  Everybody benefits from these things equally, more or less.
Wait.  I thought it has been well known that he was a sell out for years.
but its not teachers who caused the current fiscal crisis. Its government handouts to mega corporations and tax cuts for the wealthy. So why should teachers and the middle class have to be the ones who sacrifice?  perhaps the private sector could learn something from unions? I imagine that living life constantly on the edge fearing your healthcare/retirement fund might be gambled away by management is a big negative.   Man what century is America living in? Kicking it old school ala 1900 with labour rights. All around the world, people are looking at Wisconsin and thinking geez, next they'll be bringing back child labour. Which incidently the GOP attempted to do.
Was your teacher Hank Hill?
I'm European and I want to wish the best luck to the new US GP. Your country deserves better than NASCAR.
advice to get out of 1000 elo? dual queue with vakee. im in the same place as you. :)
All of the females on my mom's side of the family have a large bump on their the big toe knuckle on their right foot. I walk on my toes and have my entire life- my feet were as wide as they were long until high school. My pinky toes extend out from my feet and I can move them independently. All of my fingers used to bend backwards when I was a kid but everyone thought it was gross so I stopped- my index fingers can still be laid against the back of my hands. I am genetically MISSING five adult teeth.
I use Google Chrome Dome.  It makes me walk faster.
His name and his comment are references to Fight Club!
Can't. Unsee.
We have air freshener in a 'stall' with no proper ventilation. Yet people don't use it. Going in there after someone is basically walking into a huge enclosed fart.  I really want to make a sign. 
I am confused now!
I wouldn't say there were choices per se, but I expect it will document that those events merely occurred, and perhaps the amount of research you recovered. Purely conjecture at this point.
I wouldn't say they are cherry picked. Farm animals were chosen for their taste, availability, productivity, and other societal reasons (namely religion). But what wasn't a factor is an animal's capacity to feel pain and in general relate to the world. Pigs, for example, are actually quite smart animals, in general I think they are smarter than dogs. 
Totally depends pk the range. I was at one in St. Louis where you had to wait 3 seconds between shots. I has never heard of this before and I thought it was pretty stupid. I recently went to my local range here in Iowa and asked if they allow rapid fire. Guy said, "of course, that's what its all about."  So I loaded up a couple 33 round mags for my Glock and blew through them. The employees were soon at the window watching to see wtf I was shooting. Good times.
Don't do it.
Alas, without opposable thumbs, he'd be unable to wield it.
drools.......
FWIW, I'm on my 4th round so take these numbers with a grain of salt.  WF: 20-22, Close: 15, Chinups: 20-25, SG: 12 (have to step down tho' as my pullup bar is lame) CC: 8 Towel: 12. This round I'm focusing on longer reps - 5 second up, 5 second down (as suggested by The Four Hour Body) so my numbers are lower than the ones above.  It's always nice to mix it up once in a while to keep things fresh.
So did I, but why did 500 people upvote this shit?  Edit: 1000
Run by assholes? How so? I'd say it's run by moderators who don't enforce the rules. Take a look on any given day at the frontpage and you will see it's a hipster circlejerk.
I sweat EVERYWHERE. My armpits, my head, my face, my back, my ears. You name it, I sweat there. I don't have any health insurance so I'm fucked.  Also, I live in Florida.
Some good, basic info
I swore I was gonna limp along on my decrepit 3GS until this summer, but it finally crapped out on me one time too many on Sunday, and in a fit of pique I upgraded. I'm almost certain it was just battery wear -- I've been hard on it, and I got it within a week or two of launch in summer 09. My understanding is that there IS a battery replacement program, but it's like $100 (give or take), and putting more money into that phone just struck me as silly.  The 4 is more of the same. It's nice. The screen if fucking gorgeous, to be sure, and the camera is nicer. It's also faster. I don't regret it, especially now that I'm 800 miles from home on a business trip (read: heavy phone usage day) and my battery life is still &gt; 60% at nearly 6pm. I'd be higher if I'd quit with the Bluetooth, or quit playing Cut the Rope, but there it is. On my 3GS, I'd gotten to the point that some (cpu-intensive) games were simply unplayable -- it was a single game of Fieldrunners that shut it down on Sunday, e.g.   I can hedge a little here, because if the 5 comes out and is really compelling, I can still upgrade on my wife's line and pass the 4 to her, but right now I don't regret the upgrade.
Me: Why are all the columns in this important database table varchar(50) ? CTO: Because you never know whats going to be in there. Me: AAHHHHHH!!! (Bang head on desk!!!)
well mainly cos i know the guy who i replied to at the start lol.  also i've got no games on ma computer. Uninstalled them all for studies :/
I have that book, I would have sold it to you with solution manual.
Mosley is only 5'9" I would bet the other two are only about 5'9" or 5'10".  Roids will do that though. :/
Serious question : What happens if you genuinely don't believe a caller? I've always been afraid that if I found the first zombie, 911 wouldn't believe me!
Because "One's culture is pathological, and normality isn't necessarily sanity." Gurdjeff
that was only marginally different from what skiing that chute was going to look like
Man, Sky Cries Mary has been holding it down in Seattle for so long now.  Good stuff.
[](/awman "Why did you think that would be a good idea? D:")
[Sabre](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=B8KcX_-5ge0) you say?
"Sound" advice.
Why not? Sure.
Okay. 
He's doing a Brad Pitt impression:  http://www.destinationhollywood.com/celebrities/bradpitt/images/bradpitt_12monkeys_01.jpg
I work and go to college. 
One of my clients in Manhattan has a connection about that fast, but they pay out the nose.  In a Korean home, I bet that wouldn't cost more than $50 USD/mo.
1. You are arguing against a logical fallacy that is *not being made*. The title of OPs submission simply states the facts - the men most responsible for DOMA cheated on their wives. The article itself simply points out the hypocrisy involved.  2. This is the entire point of the article.  3. Agreed!
Edgy!
US govt spends about 11k per person annually.  so if you have a family of 3 and didnt pay 33k in income/FICA taxes last year, thank some rich guy for picking up your share.  kudos to you
I try to always carry one on me when I leave the house. Sadly, this has yet to happen. But, someday... someday.
I closed it after it made the assumption that the only way I could help my kid with schoolwork would be to hire a tutor
Try some [DJ Shadow](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=bhWyKysFJck&amp;feature=related), its not *exactly* like this track.. But hey I associate these two, dark and drums. Haha I fell in love with DJ Shadow at Spookfest in SF this year. Had a brilliant live show!
* 3\. Made a decision to turn our will and our lives over to the care of **God** as we understood Him. * 5\. Admitted to **God**, to ourselves, and to another human being the exact nature of our wrongs. * 6\. Were entirely ready to have **God** remove all these defects of character. * 7\. Humbly asked **Him** to remove our shortcomings. * 11\. Sought through prayer and meditation to improve our conscious contact with **God**, as we understood **Him**, praying only for knowledge of His will for us and the power to carry that out.
I'm sure Woody Allen would have something clever to say here...
Yes. Don't mix in a single thor with your army. It won't make a bit a difference. I'd hate to not be able to clump my mutas to minimize damage taken and maximize damage dealt.
http://blacksburg.craigslist.org/vgm/2184948414.html -- posted a month ago, but maybe they've still got it.  Also, there's r/VirginiaTech you can post at
Finding your higher power as you understand it is essential for completing and being successful in any 12 step program.  Go to any AA or NA meeting and you will see that it is not about religion.  AA is certainly not "wrong" like you all are saying it is, it is essential for helping people with the chronic disease of addiction get and stay sober.
but its the most fun against deathclaws.
I've never seen a corgi give the "please kill me" look before.
The milkman
One of [these badboys.](http://img4.realsimple.com/images/food-recipes/tools-products/0709/knife-sharpener_300.jpg)
You say you're "a" director - how many others are there on a given show (like iCarly)... do you take turns basically? Do you choose which episodes you want to direct?
Starfuckers Inc.  That said, he deserves it and I very happy for him.   
jade plants.
&lt;insert obligatory diva cup advertisement here&gt;  Honestly, pooping (I get period shits too) and sex are the main reasons I love that thing.  Oh and lugging around tampons--I hate having to do that.  If it were not for those things I would be less impressed.
Sometimes I wish I could be that eccentric aunt in the family. Gift shopping would become an awesome adventure. No longer do I have to fret about size or color! Instead I can focus on finding the cheapest canned hams and the most toxic soaps, t-shirts that say "Maximum Huevos" and "Chili-goth 10! The Smeltering" and canned bread and xuitlacoche will be the stocking stuffers.
lol.   I laugh my ass off every time I see gay males complaining they can't give blood at the red cross.   The gay male community aren't doing themselves any favors in terms of not using condoms, and their STD infection rate.   Btw... getting HIV from oral is only possible if you have either open sores on/in your mouth, or they guy you were blowing had open sores on his dick. 
Agreed.  I remember being a kid and just loving it.  I heard that they were redoing it, but never ended up seeing any new episodes.  Sometimes old memories are best left undisturbed
It's not a bad start by any stretch of the imagination. It got me to finish reading it which is saying something. Keep going at it. I would read more of it.  A hook can never be delivered too early... that's why it's a hook. It is the thing that tells the reader instantly that they want to read more. In a sense you have a mini-hook in the fact that people may want to know more about this world, but to be honest it doesn't sound all too sci-fi or too different from our world.   Also, "all-singing all-dancing" is too blatant a ripoff from fight club, considering the theme of the material world. Unless, of course, you didn't take it from Fight Club... then it was an unintentional ripoff.
You can’t even take a cup of coffee from a lobbyist.
Wow, um, never mind then? Sorry I helped you out by giving you information she had already made available only a few comments prior? Geez, guy. Way to make me feel stupid for caring :(
He's definitely from Nebraska. I live in Omaha and people here, in my opinion, are way too quick to claim him as a local. I believe he is from the southeastern portion of the state, which is pretty much farmland.
COME AT ME BROSKI 
Was this with a private company, or with one of the governments? Is it too legally dangerous to say who is selling these?  Kudos on sticking to your principals.
It's a flat bread. I'm looking for this flat bread jammed full of delicious lamb curry, malai kafta, etc. 
;) 
If you're too stupid to download things, you ought to pay for them.
As long as you know "Maggie's Farm" is a Bob Dylan song
Co.uk is not a TLD, .uk is the TLD.  Parsing this very common second level domain will require some special cases.  It's not possible to infer the correct domain name from just the string alone.  Though you could look into doing some DNS queries if you really want to get this right.
Listening to it right now! Absolutely EPIC song! {4]
Remember, they hunt in packs.  So if one is staring at you, there's probably another one hiding in the cupboard ready to strike.
[Dry your feet off and put on socks before your feet touch the bathroom floor...](http://i.imgur.com/6JXDM.jpg)
please explain your downvotes bra?
I actually like rain.   Sitting in your room browsing reddit while rain trickles your window. 
you got right and wrong backwards imo
Yes they can, but it rarely happens. I got caught torrenting Inception stupidly. I got a warning for the first offense. If you're downloading more obscure stuff like indie bands and such there's almost no chance they'll catch you. I just use mediafire for my music nowadays which works pretty well. Then I make a list of other things and grab them whenever I go home.
Start by posting about downloading them in a public forum, such as on reddit...
Well, someone ought to show some science fiction on TV, since there isn't a sci-fi network anymore.
A bit distressing that their example seems to be intended to validate e-mail addresses, though.
Another brilliant name the Victorians came up with: 'merrybegot'.   It means 'bastard'. Conjures such a happy image... 
I believe the color is Perler - Butterscotch
Actually they do; however, the lime was originally served with bottles to keep flies out, not for flavor. 
There's a restaurant called Sunny Palace in East Brunswick in central Jersey. I'm not sure exactly how many people they can accommodate but I've attended a few banquets there.  Food's pretty good, too.
Thanks. Let's just hope we never see anything like this in any major competition. Or any other one for that matter. It was disgraceful.
I usually scroll through IAMA's looking for the OP's comments. In this thread I find myself skipping all the OP's comments and going straight for readers comments. This thread is damn funny. 
IMO, LeBron and Wade didn't make the wrong decision. The problem is Bosh is a no-impact player who we really don't need. If you watch games closely, you'll notice he gets plenty of wide open shots because teams just forget about him. I'd rather have an above average center and point guard, instead of Bosh's 15mil contract. Haslem can hold down the PF position just fine.
Either way, this house is awesome. I'd love to live in a house like this.
I'd like to see Luis Enrique coach the first team for a while first… maybe a couple of seasons, then if he isn't that good, go back to the B team or maybe export their philosophy to another team in La Liga… which needs some improving.
Is it harder to spam on an Arcade Machine? We're getting one (2 in the world) for doing THIS   http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=sWIWYSLMrrs
Agree. Not necessary, but a good habit to get into that will help drive the point.
When Arthur Dent told the same story to Fenchurch, he used the word "biscuits".  Confused the hell out of 15 year old me, trying to figure out what a "packet of biscuits" was.
Good idea with the baby wipes... hmmm... I just decided to run an 84 km race in May, and so I've gotta start thinking about the logistics!
*you're
unless it was with a date rape drug..
This morning.
I appreciate your input.  I would hope that my law degree would qualify so that I could go straight into the Legal Practice Course.
AE &gt; BE
Does anyone know the name of the full documentary?
Derp:-D
just a note to jonahan52, i accidentally quit the whole clan and sent another request to join.  i was trying to leave the squad but i think i selected leave clan.  yay, thanks
[Best episode ever](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=oiljoS4ChOk)
 This is what I love about fittit: I know you're kidding.  If I were to read this on another forum, I wouldn't have any idea if you were or not.
what if ur big toe is webbed?
Same here, got my monitor at 1080 too. It's a lot easier to display media when you just mirror the screens. No moving windows around on a screen I can't see anymore for me!
&gt; To my knowledge also, fruit flies are neither resource-gatherers nor have family-protecting adults and so this argues against the explanation given.  I realize that; I probably should've distanced those two points. I'm just saying that same-sex coupling is hardly unnatural. It's neither high-level enough to call perversion nor disadvantageous enough to warrant controlling. It's a behavior as old as sexual reproduction and deep-set enough that its morality is not up for discussion.
You aren't agreeing to disagree, you're trying to end the exchange because you know you're wrong and even threw in a few pot-shots for good measure. 
Wow thanks, now I don't have to click through loads of them. Is there any way I can check what updates I've already installed, and can uninstall them? 
[Relevant](http://i.imgur.com/fsDcS.jpg)
34E marathoner, I wear Shock Absorber max support sports bras. 
We're quipping over pronouns now? 
and people wonder why we use the term hivemind?  also i LOVE hoodie strings.
Throwing something at another car is a felony in some states. 
Pledged. Creatures 1-3 and docking station played a big role in my current interests in artificial life and AI. Looking forward to more peeks inside Steve Grand's head.
I don't even know exactly what (American) College is, I got schooled in the UK.  I downvoted. **Boom.**
280 reviews averaging 4 stars on Amazon.   http://www.amazon.com/Switched-Trylle-Trilogy-Book-1/dp/1453688935/ref=ntt_at_ep_dpt_1
those who can do, those that cannot ,... teach. use those skills and put them to something productive that you find fulfilling.  a person that does a career that they enjoy never works a day in there life
You never said every year, you said every day. And that these "thousands of raids every day" save "countless millions" of lives.   Those people (who happen to be cops) should not be "reprimanded" they should be in jail.
Only one. I'd tried it earlier that week so I was reluctant at first, but by cube #3, I had no choice but to order one. Awful, awful stuff that Brennivin. The bottle of it got last Christmas isn't going to be opened any time soon.
hahaha. bravo.
I found the "not for resale" to be hilarious.
Ho ho, lucky I was wearing an extra large piece of the True Power Supply today.
Touché
I would suggest Elementary Lessons in Logic by William Stanley Jevons 
This is a trend which needs to stop.
I use US Bank and its free. I used to go through a credit union and they said they would charge me a premium if I didn't have a at least 100 dollars in my checking/savings at all times
Hrm, nope. It also doesn't have:  Flying birds, craftable items, stackable blocks, ACOG sights or hot babes.   Come to think of it, I have no idea why anyone will play it. :\
The screen is blank when i have a video card in the system. I can only get into the desktop when the video card is out and running on on-board video.
OK, so we're back to trying to define "right." Let's give it one more try.  I hope you yourself understand the flimsiness of your last argument, which is basically "see, the other countries are jerks too, sometimes." Of course they are, and it's way too easy to counter that by pointing out the cases (plenty) of the US being a jerk too. Arguing about which jerk is jerkier is an exercise in futility.  Believers have an easy cop-out of this: even if they don't say it explicitly, they always assume that there exist some Higher Divine Right and Good, and so long as you know what it is, you're fine and covered. You can simply ignore everyone else's concerns. But here we are in the Atheism subreddit, so I have a hope that you are not going to seriously resort to this (even if the US itself often acts as if it does).  So what do we, poor unguided unbelievers, have for our ethical compass? Do we have one at all? Sure we do, and it's very simple: openness, communication, _consensus_. This stuff works, even when some of the participants are jerks. Just look at Wikipedia. In 2001, very few people believed the open-for-all model can work; I was a skeptic too. And yet it worked much better than anyone hoped for. Not only did it produce generally reliable material; it set an entire _new standard of neutrality_ - so much so that I, for one, cannot calmly use my Britannica and Americana volumes anymore: trained by Wikipedia, I cannot help noticing how much bias, wishful thinking, hidden agendas lurk in nearly every sentence of those "authoritative sources". Encyclopedias will never be the same again. That is what I call genuine progress; and since neutrality, fairness, completeness are (at least for me) ethically charged concepts, this is also the best example of _ethical progress_ I know.  And the way Wikipedia achieved that was simple: by being open and not giving preferential treatment to anyone. You may imagine that as a Ph.D. in some topic you are entitled to the final say, but that's wrong. You have the same rights as everyone else; no article can be "owned" by someone. Tolerance, patience, and persistence work much better than arrogance, _especially_ when you have to deal with real people who love to disagree and call each other jerks.   Fortunately, by now it's not just a few lone dreamers who understand that openness, respect, and consensus are not only the best but the _only_ sustainable way to do global politics. Unfortunately, one of the most powerful countries in the world still prefers to act like it has a monopoly on truth, equating might with right. And yet I'm an optimist; it may take 50 or 100 years but consensus politics _will_ win. There's simply no other way ahead.  And that nicely returns us to the original poster's message. I am convinced that militarism, arrogance, and religious beliefs are to a large degree correlated, and a decrease in one leads to others diminishing too. The numbers from the latest US census give me some basis for my optimism; it still lags behind most developed countries but not by much, and it's catching up.
1. Software is so cool?  2. How much software(in pounds) is worth a person's life?  3. If Canada were a real country, how much software would it need in a given business week?  4. Dianne Keaton is well known for being an actress, how can software benefit the future?  5. Lets say you're on the edge of a cliff holding some baby and our entire software company(one on each arm) and you can only save one... How fast do you drop that baby?  6. Finally, if instead of being a software company, it turned out we actually made snuff films, how "pumped" would you be on a scale of one to eleven?
I think the dark stuff is mold.  EDIT: the lighter one is clearly put alongside for comparison  DOUBLE EDIT: Oh, my bad, I did not detect the sarcasm, nor have I ever seen such dark bud.
&gt; Entering a joke response will just be classed as another religious person  [That's not true. This time or last time](http://www.reddit.com/r/unitedkingdom/comments/fshx2/for_those_people_who_are_considering_selecting_a/c1iquq2)
Maybe he enjoys waiting.
I remember the books all saying AD&amp;D so I'm assuming the A stands for advanced.
My last semester of high school, I'm taking Government from the local community college.  They had a deal with my school where the professor would come out to the school and teach in a classroom.  I should mention that I live in Mission, TX, 10 miles from the Mexico border, so you can imagine that 90% of the people here are Hispanic and bilingual... This professor (Mr. Hornsby) was white, and not bilingual.  So anyways, there's these three girls in class that annoy the shit out of everyone, cause they sit there talking away in the annoying fresa-style (think valley-girl, but in Spanish).  Eventually, professor gets fed up and decides he doesn't want any Spanish spoken, so they begin fucking with him after that, throwing his briefcase in the trash can while he went to the restroom.  When he got back he accuses them, correctly, and one girl starts telling him shit in Spanish...  He responds that he doesn't know a word she's saying, but that he'll try to talk with the little Spanish he knows, and says, "Besa mi culo, puta" (Kiss my ass, bitch/whore). Long story short, she reports him, he gets fired, or the contract from my high school revoked.  A week later, a sign saying Viva Hornsby! shows up on the bulletin board in class.
I want to do this, I live by Central and 19th and I really really need to go down there and eat at more of the places I'm missing!
If you say so...
I always felt like the litmus test for this was: is it going to help you communicate?  There are a lot of spanish speaking people in places like Chipotle/Qdoba but if they're manning the food counter they're clearly capable of taking an order in english.  Speaking spanish at that point seems unnecessary. However, if the fruit stand person only understand spanish, I think it would be reasonably well-received to try, if you're being sincere about it.  
I'm only half way through, but I'm really liking this album so far.   Best Busta Ryhmes verse in a while on "Crane Style"
&gt; It's risky from a security perspective because if you're processing the head of one cow and the tail of another.....if the second cow shits in the cache, you may end up with shit for brains.  What? Analogy aside, this is not true. That's why there is cache coherency between threads. Can you explain what you mean by "the second cow shitting in the cache" (not the analogy, just actually what scenario you are describing)?  Hyperthreading is essentially Intel's marketing name for SMT (well.. their version of SMT) and there is no issue from a hardware correct execution path standpoint with respect to one thread modifying the cache and another using it. The only issue would be if the programmer wasn't using semaphores/mutexes to ensure shared resources are thread-safe. But, this issue exists in all multithreaded systems and is not specific to hyperthreading/smt.  I'm also not sure what you mean by it being "risky from a security perspective." If you're talking about using one thread to inject code into another, this is no less secure than a non-smt system.
My IWB gun gets a bit of lint in it as well. No getting around it, I'm afraid.
It depends on Howard's mood. If they have an important guest in or it's late in the show, he will hang on people who start their calls by grinding the show to a halt.  Also, Awesome Angelo has said that there's something going on with his family that doesn't allow him to go on the show anymore. If i remember correctly maybe a year ago Howard said that Double-A would be coming on the show and explain everything, but so far he hasn't.  "heyhowardhowsitgoingwhatsgoingon"
Less government restrictions is something I can support, especially a repeal of the [Taft-Hartley Act, which prohibits a whole slew of strikes and boycotts previously in labor unions' arsenals](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Taft-Hartley_Act).
I'm sorry to hear that this happened to you. I have to ask though, if you have no memory of the event then how do you know it happened? I'm not insinuating that this is a fake post or you made up the story, I'm just curious.
I whole heartedly agree with this comic.
They're only really successful at making Jesus freaks out of future prisoners.  The success rate for those programs are very poor, and my opinion is that they make 2, fatal mistakes: They let people continue to surround themselves with their addiction (what you *shouldn't* be doing), and they tell people to give up against a higher power.  What inevitably happens is that, when faced with the option of returning back to whatever bad habit they are trying to escape, their 'higher power' is obtrusively absent.  Then, down they go.
shouldn't your name be Ree_Ree?
It's justified, people here need education.  I used to work in commodity derivatives and I've done extensive work with the Basel systems.  Even worse than the internal methods for valuing these assets are the government suggestions.  If you followed the gov rules you'd be massively underestimating volatility in almost all asset classes, especially since the turmoil began.  The gov didn't even have the sense or manpower to evaluate their own rules let alone scrutinize the rules of banks that were allowed to use their own models.  Smart banks (like the one I worked for), picked up on this and held far more capital in reserve than needed despite complaints from shareholders.  Banks either unwilling or too stupid to question the sensibility of the Basel guidelines did not and suffered greatly.
Nice try Leo Wong.
upvoted for it being a poll-type question
Uh that's not a particularly dazzling feat. DDoS is pretty much the definition of a script kiddie feat.
Fuck making insoles, make entire shoes out of it. LEGITIMATE MOON SHOES :)
Come on. I know mass transit is one of your favorite subjects, but overhead lines are one of the things that makes cities ugly. Be them just regular electrical transmission lines, communication lines,  or power lines for transportation.   Having said that, sometimes I imagine all transportation, personal or mass transit,  powered by overhead lines or something similar to a third rail.
Funny Viagra Story and how to buy
Lawrence! I imagine there are plenty of Olathe Redditors with Garmin there. 
He looks exactly the same!
Here I thought this was gonna be about hippies blowing themselves up.  I guess those anti-vaccination types have to whine about *something*.
My roomate works at IBM and they are obviously forced to use lotus notes.  One time he was talking to an older coworker and he mentioned how much he hated it. The coworker he was talking to? He wrote lotus notes.  Awkwardness ensued.
You'll need all 3 come playoffs. 
sure thing, internet tough guy. keep telling yourself you're making a difference and you might start to believe it. 
McGee had planned to do a similar dunk to Ibaka's "save the toy" dunk, except with a chocolate bar. I guess he was just flat out of ideas at the end.
I am allergic to tons of shit. Wheat, barley, corn, some seafood, dairy, grass, trees, pollen, dust, animals with fur. I also have asthma, eczema and athletes foot on my feet and hands upon occasion. It's interesting that there can be so many things wrong with your body and you can still function pretty well.
Seriously. Can you please tell me where I can find this? My friend's grandmother loves skulls and would love this chair. I have to know. 
That sound just indicates that there is darkness nearby. Just search "ambiance" in the Minepedia, and you can learn all about it.
I vote for Scab Laws.  Scab: a person who refuses to strike or to join a labor union or who takes over the job responsibilities of a striking worker.
You have to cry a lot as well
As victims of child abuse?
I can pop my shoulders out of their sockets. The left one goes back without much trouble. The right one stays out until I can find someone to pop it back in.
Each golfer gets a point for every player they beat in the Men's Pro Open division during a tournament. Every golfer also gets a single point for every tournament they play in. You get the total points of the four players you choose.
I figure if anywhere has the power to turn the tide of a contest, it would be reddit!  I honestly haven't watched the other videos and don't care if they're better. I've voted for the person I know, and hopefully you can trust my judgment. She is a genuinely great person, honest and hardworking, more than deserving. If you were in a contest, she'd vote for you!
No longer confused. Needed to see the context. 
It could be Weird Al.
Whole brain emulation is my ace in the hole.  Still, recent advances have made me think that we may get there earlier using more efficient techniques.  
No, just his MANN MILK.
MOTHER  FUCKING  **I N C E P T I O N**
Of course they are, but to expect RM to keep pace with this Barca side is unrealistic
no problem. you could find local small businesses to volunteer. granite guy, sign guy, bodyshop.  then youll just need to find the rubber from a sign supply house, oh, and if the sign guy has a plotter, but has never cut rubber, you want 1/16" thick stuff, his plotter must have at least 400g downforce.  then everything else is his regular stuff.
Are you taking this from a Judeo-Christian view, or what?
I think he's talking about breaking the hardware. I broke mine and had a new one free within 72 hours, and I've been buying books like mad since. Bezos knows what he's doing, it's probably the first story I tell when people ask me about my kindle, aside from the fact I have my entire course's readings on it, meticulously organised and titled. Because I'm just that cool.
I got mine at gohastings.com used.  It's not a knock off or anything (has the MS sticker and shit).  Unfortunately they're sold out now, but I'm sure other retailers will have similar prices.  New they were $70.  Here's the link in case they ever get more in: http://www.gohastings.com/product/GAME/Xbox-360-250GB-Hard-Drive/sku/280144790.uts
Fire in her hole!
Too much trouble. accidentally break a window. 
Hmm... how not to use Reddit.  1. Upvote if you're from Earth!  2. TIL we're not alone.
Love these guys. Philly represent.
Anyone else read this in the "good idea/bad idea" voice from Animaniacs?
I'm interested in the Hand of the Praetors, but they are $5 each?  I can find them for about $3 online... http://magic.tcgplayer.com/db/magic_single_card.asp?cn=Hand%20of%20the%20Praetors  I'd offer $16 for the Hand of the Praetors, Captivating Vampire and Frost Titan.
Scumbag "girl sitting in front" receives tissues after making mess.  Wipes hands and walks away.
Legitimate question: does it have to do anything with more experienced adults (the parents) might know what would be a better match, with compatibility, personality, etc.? It seems a lot of non-arranged marriages the people don't put much thought into the match, and just go with their feelings.
nope
I know I'm quoting from the article, but this is 100% of my problem with the U.S. government in the current situation (or, get some balls people!):  The débacle of Washington’s handling of the Libya issue is symbolic of a wider problem at the heart of the Obama administration’s foreign policy. The fact that it took ten days and at least a thousand dead on the streets of Libya’s cities before President Obama finally mustered the courage to call for Muammar “mad dog” Gaddafi to step down is highly embarrassing for the world’s only superpower, and emblematic of a deer-in-the-headlights approach to world leadership. Washington seems incapable of decisive decision-making on foreign policy at the moment, a far cry from the days when it swept entire regimes from power, and defeated America’s enemies with deep-seated conviction and an unshakeable drive for victory.
Why do we rage when an asshat gets his own show on a good network, but rejoice when a good show that got shafted gets a second chance on an equally good network? 
&gt;That's not devil's advocate, that's popular opinion.  Someone doesn't know what the meaning of devil's advocate is.  Popular opinion doesn't necessarily mean his opinion.
I would call it date rape...
so what time does this start est? 
Why "perceived"?
After seeing Destiny lose from Minigun six times in a row, attempting the same damn thing each game, I am not sure he could ever be a pro gamer. He has the apm, but he is painfully uncreative. 
meh AIDs is so 90's its practically cured now.  Everybody now knows the big thing is Cancer.  [](/troll)
Yes because Pit Bulls are human aggressive.  Edit: Fuck you and everyone who thinks that Pit Bulls are Human aggressive dogs.
"Your face will melt off and your children will weep over your exploded body." -Charlie Sheen, 28 Feb 2011
Well I consider the possibility of a visitation from life on another planet **far** more acceptable than the possibility of being visited by a god.
Turok also taught me you can run off of a cliff then jump about 4 feet later.  
What about if you're still attending?
Rainbow tables.... and unicorns
The second film was actually pretty good. I've not seen the 3rd one.
I used my own name too. Fuck anonymity.
We've tried those already. I tried Musipedia's search engine too, and it did find Borodin's string quarted piece, which sounds quite close. But it's not it.
this is so true
Well, it looks like Schroedinger didn't account for the possibility of infinite cats...
Don't stretch before working out. It does nothing and can actually impede performance for a few minutes after.
No, actually, the OP is just pandering to the uber-righteous atheist squad here on Reddit.
wow, I can't believe I never thought of that...*facepalm* thanks!
Things like this are seen in /r/circlejerk, as a way to harvest karma, making sure the "Vote up if" is 95% of reddit.
Because they want to make sure you're serious about unsubscribing, so they give you an extra week to think about it.
Just say no to hard rules without any respect to context.  If I interviewed someone for hands on work at a west coast engineering company, whoever shows up in a suit would be seen as out of touch and demonstrates a bit of a lack in cohesiveness.  Interviews involve personal interactions and are as much about getting along with the interviewer and winning them over as it is the technical elements of the job. Using one-size-fits-all advice like this would be the same expecting a t-shirt at wal-mart to be form-fitting.  I would recommend slacks and a nice collared shirt to the OP. It makes you look like you're both aware of the environment and trying to impress.
No that's not the one either. When I get my laptop I'll see if I can rip it out of the ASOT I've got.  Good mix though!
Absolutely
&gt;We don't believe in marriage.  Good for you, if there ever was a divorce, you would get the short end of the stick.
Lol, @ the Malibu Inn. My ex used to work there.
I grew up in a big city, and was hardly social at all with other kids my age, As a result I grew very awkward and I don't deal well with people. When I was fourteen years old I moved to a small town with about four hundred kids at my new high school, EVERY ONE OF THEM asked me my name at some point or other throughout my first week, and after the first hour or so I started telling them to fuck off, and leave me alone (a good impression to make at a new school, I know :\ ). I hadn't really been able to respond to any of them because I was so weirded out that these people I didn't know were actually talking to me. I started introducing myself to other students as "Dave", and apologizing for my behavior for the first week or two, and telling them that I was upset to move away from my old friends, and my medication magnified my emotions.... My name is not even close to Dave but that is what everybody called me, Teachers Included, I privately asked them to call me that, because "It's obviously not my name, but it's my middle name and that's what my parents have called me since birth." (also not true). This escalated in to an entire highschool calling me dave for about a year before my parents got called in over some disciplinary issues, and when the teachers kept referencing "Dave" my mom finally goes "WHO In the fuck is DAVE?" My fun was over :(   Tl;Dr: Moved to a rural town, Didn't know how to respond to so much attention, Gave everyone a fake name, Whole school called me "Dave" for a year or so. 
CONGRATUALATIONS: YOU WIN THE AWARD FOR THE MOST IGNORANT ANSWER SO FAR.   Primitive man was taller and healthier than modern man. We know that from exacting archaeological research. He had little or no dietary diseases. There were always old people. Infections (very common until WWII) caused most deaths after childhood diseases and childbirth complications. Man outlived woman until the advent of antibiotics and gynechology.   Those modern folks whom you say live more frugally do not. They live more cheaply and pay for it in bad health. (Apparently you don't know the difference between frugal and cheap. Educate yourself if that is possible.) Obesity and poverty go hand in hand, and always on a grain diet.   Now I know this is beyond your mental abilities so have someone explain it to you. An influential researcher named Keys fudged some data and got it wrong in the 1950s and said saturated fat was bad. By 1970 he and the US government were on a campaign for its citizens to eat more carbs (mostly from grain) and they did. The result?  The obesity rate that had been steady at 6% for 50 years began to climb. It is now 66%. We now have a diabetes epidemic. Adult onset diabetes, then found only in obese adults, is now found in 9-month olds and has been renamed Type II diabetes. Heart Disease, rare before the 1950, is now reaching epidemic proportions. Alzeheimer's Disease has a carb connection with some researchers calling it Type III diabetes.  During WWII two-thirds of the draftees (up to the age of 45) were at weight or underweight. Last year 25% of the young people in their 20s or younger who wanted to join the military were too fat.   Try to stuff into you little mind that we now eat chemicals and carb-rich empty food, thanks to six staple crops, mostly grains. Grazing on mushrooms and worms didn't cause all of that. And in fact that worm comment shows just how pathetically ignorant you are.  What a paleo diet is is replicating in modern times the nuritional profile of neolithic humans when they were far healthier and robust than we are now.  It starts with no pesticides, fungicides or hormones, which is pretty stupid in your way of thinking. It is avoiding high fructose corn syrup which has worse effects on your body than binge drinking. That's pretty stupid in your way of thinking, too. It's avoiding the foods that promote constant production of insulin thus obesity. That's pretty stupid in your way of thinking also. It's eating foods that are disease preventative. That's really stupid in your way of thinking as well because... gosh... grains are just so good.  The point is, BenDumbAmdumb, you shit in your ignorant pants and you sat in it. 
I agree with the general premise of your post but I struggle to feel like the corporate slave drivers earned their money at all. At some point historically somebody put these corporations into a dominating position with hard work... But America is governed largely by corporate monopolies who can never fail to make money.  It's a military industrial complex, it's corrupt at the very core. Those people didn't do anything to earn their money besides know the right people and sign the most corrupt deals they could find.  Generalisations I know but the simple fact is, the super wealthy rarely earned their money *fairly*.
This is why "content" ratings don't really make any sense. Why is The Dark Knight considered more "family friendly" than a movie with a few curses in it?
Nope, I'm out in the sticks, as it is I will have to haul them into town just to get rid of them. I will check around to see if there is such a place in the city, thanks for the suggestion.
I don't think judging it based on how close it is to the current trend of "minimal movie posters" is really fair. I think it stands up as art in its own right, even without being especially clever or minimal.  The extra detail that precludes it from being classed as "minimal" is well-executed, and works given the subject matter. To me, I think actually does a pretty good job of evoking the foreboding "calm before the storm" feeling before a battle (something which a clever in-joke would be unlikely to achieve), and above all, I think it *looks good*.
&gt;I'm guessing you haven't bought stock?  No I find stocks are like the dollar, &amp; are a collar. A kin to what a slave wears, that owners place on the masses in our wage slavery world, to keep them in bond-age. Fuck stocks &amp; bonds.  Bill gates owns 580,976,087 (as of Feb 15, 2011)shares @ 26.58 a share &amp; thus worth 15,542,344,392.46 [source](http://finance.yahoo.com/q/mh?s=MSFT)  Thats 15 1/2 billion &amp; if he can not sell it, as you claim in one swoop, he could sell as much as he could in one swoop, or even none. He could use the US$33.5 billion in the bill and melinda fund, that is held tight like most tight assed greedy fucks do.
Oh my, no.
The author of the comment that I replied to was claiming that he himself was a member of the Aryan Brotherhood, while at the same time claiming that no one gets to leave and that even after release one is not free from their obligations to the gang. Thus, his "Knock knock?" comment was meant to imply that HE was calling me back to duty...over the internet...via Reddit. 
It's a shame he died so young.
Polk County, Florida laid off 300 this last Friday.  They eliminated the media specialist (library is closed) and the IT teacher.  Sad day.
Oh I don't know... it's a 9-5 sort of environment and I really don't want to sacrifice my evenings. Could probably go in very early but that sucks too. I just put the headphones on and deal with it. Fuck it I get paid whether even if things don't get done as efficiently as they could.
In real life, I went to see all three of these with my mom. [](/foreveralone "true facts!")
Did that guy just completely miss the point, or did I? Wouldn't the controllers be plugged into your PS3? I can't see Steam becoming a "cloud gaming" service, more likely they are just offering the Steam store on PS3. Correct me if I'm wrong.
## 
I spent most of my time occupying various administration buildings... smoking a lot of thai stick... breaking into the ROTC... and bowling.
That shit in the dryer is gold.
Interesting news.  Best advice to baldies, coming from one: its all about personality and style.  I'm bald, no problems getting girls.  You know what's really unattractive?  Insecurity
Dude, I love those shows! Thanks for doing this AMA!   So, do you have any idea what the general opinion is among the people who work on the show, of people who aren't in your target demographic but enjoy the show? As a 22 year old male, I realize that I'm not who you guys are trying to impress. Are you guys more psyched that your work is reaching out to such different people, or just creeped out?  Also: Is the musical aspect of Victorious in any way trying to capitalize off of the success of Glee? Are you guys specifically trying to work off of their successful model in anyway during the musical bits, or are you just trying to do your own thing? I would think that you'd be trying to reach that same core group of kids that love Glee, and consequently leaning on making the show more like that.  
It's on Hulu. 
My 8yr old has an entirely unhealthy amount of Woot shirts. I just bought this one for her, as well. She's in her room playing. I hear the distant sounds of a sonic screwdriver.
as always, feel free to delete and repost for working artwork.Artwork counts toward completeness.  have a good one. anneyong.
I like my coffee how I like my women; pale and sweet.
The third party idea has been done, to reasonable success.  This guy is just circlejerking.
90% of those feminists would react the same way those '75% of women' would. It's like any group of people who identify under the same label... I think that the type of woman more likely to label herself 'a feminist' is the type who feels *strongly* enough about this issue to label herself so (self included). Unfortunately there are outliers in that group too, misanderists who see everything as an awful product of patriarchy and ignore the inequalities for the male sex (like the issue of custody)... whereas if you asked *any* woman 'do you think that women should be treated as the equals to males that they are' they would say 'yes'... *bam*, they are feminists too... I just think that the only people who label themselves as feminist are people who take these issues very seriously and actively argue against gender inequalities... and unfortunately some of those are also mentallers.
Anz doesn't allow cartoons, I tried with awesome face :C
A hacky way is to post a "yes" comment and a "no" comment and see the results, but then again, some people might just down vote either for the trullz.
lol....Funny enough....I would actually prefer being scalped than hear that song again!
You forgot then end of the joke. The union worker says he needs 35/hr + a full pension and HC to make cookies. The company lays off the union guys and outsources to China. 
Nw, they're worth it tbh.  I just started re-listening to nmh (never liked them the first time round), its really growing on me but, yea, go radiohead and nmh!
The 24 I go to is in a predominately Asian area.  There are many old naked asian men wiping themselves.  
Yeah, thanks.   Would you be willing to sell your REM Dreamer?  Obviously, it's only worthwhile to me if it's significantly less than the original price (or else if I want to pay that much I'll just buy it direct).  No problem if not - but it doesn't hurt to ask.
my bad. i'm deleting
Credibility.
Enjoyed. Much better than a lot of the other stuff i've heard by Substep Infrabass.
That...doesn't make any sense. 
"Well, he didn't have any drugs in his house. But he shot an officer, so we're going to have to give him a felony, even though we murdered his family." 
It's not very well hidden. 
Ya, my paranoia may go a little deeper than that. Not only would I have to meet you, I would say I would have to clock about 1500 hours with you on a personal level, plus go to your house and make sure everything's on the up and up there. Blood, urine, and hair samples, would be next..... :)
The best part of my day is that I got everything done that I needed to and I have a plan for tomorrow.   This is a big accomplishment since I am easily distracted with other things usually.  Except today.  And, that feels pretty good.  Reddit without guilt of procrastination or total failure....  priceless.
that's one fucked up owl.  talk about being in the wrong place at the wrong time
I've been making up color names for a while. Purple + orange = Pornge.
You should start at the [Kim Wong Ark](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/United_States_v._Wong_Kim_Ark) case.
As someone who works retail, I can say that depending on how long we've been on shift, such a transaction trick will go right over our heads.
"It's just a tool of the man to keep a brotha down" - Homie D. Clown
It's really good as R&amp;B goes. I love [Novacane](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=U-2_11mOIOY)  Side Note: What's with everyone calling these things Mixtapes? Das Racist does that with their albums too.
700 cals in 48 miles @ 12 minute-miles... that's like 175 calories/hour, which would be about right if he's a lightweight (130-140 lbs).  He said in another post he's 188 lbs though... I would definitely bonk.  I'm in Utah.  Triathlons are usually in lakes around here, although they're generally at higher elevations or early season, so you need a wetsuit most of the time.  Most of the sprints are pools.
That's why I let my girlfriend play with my rooster, because cocks are cocks.
hmmm, !! should do it. At least, it does on my machine. zsh 4.3.10 (x86_64-redhat-linux-gnu)
lolol.  SAMESIES!
I nominate these to be the most passive-aggressive series of comments in this thread.
academy graduates don't get chances at almost all clubs
First thing I thought of when I saw this image, Zissou cat.
It looks like Portal.
It sounds like a government-being-nice thing then.
&gt;while that's drastic, I don't understand why there's a "gay club". We had a Gay-Straight Alliance in school and the morality and logic of it drove me insane. First off, it's a group about sex/sexuality. Being almost all members would be under 18, you're supporting illegal activity (this is California. Age of consent is 18, with no exception laws such as within three years age or such). I doubt a group for BDSM would survive a chance at being made.  &gt;I don't understand why there's a "gay club".  clearly. being in a gay social/activist group isn't just a bunch of kids practicing buttsex...wtf dude. the primary purpose is as a support network for kids who are often outcasts from school/families/society, so they can develop healthy social bonds and lead fulfilling lives.  nor is it "illegal" for underage kids to have sex with each other, so the whole legality part is null and void as well. we even teach sexual education in standard school curriculums.
That's more or less what I was thinking (I can't stand the meager 1440 x 900 on my 15" MBP), though the resolution on the 17in. should be plenty for daily use. 
If you saw Avatar baked as a cake in the IMax in 3D you would think it was an amazing movie.
You forgot virtue 14:  Fuck bitches/get money.
Steve Jobs.
It has become a natural progression in my mind. If your contending and over 30 you sit out about 8-10 games between all star break and the end of the regular season. Taper off, rest up and then have fresh legs to start the playoffs.
Poorly coached team with a third of the lineup consisting of players that do not have NHL-level talent.
It may be less "efficient", but it *can* provide a greater total power output because you're using many more muscles, over all.  *Some* of them are applying force by leveraging against the handlebars.  So burning 20% more energy for a 10% gain in total power output is a good compromise in certain situations - just watch a sprinter do exactly this when he's unleashing that final all-or-nothing burst.
Most likely because both her and Tasteless act as play-by-play commentators while Artosis is color commentary.
It's probably a mixture of the new camera, angle and the traction control - you could get every last bit out the car. Now, you have to be smooth.
You would willing to do something like that too if that was the only thing you were really known for, and you hadn't done much in the 30 years since.
Bad analogy time!  Pretend you are buying a car. They run your credit and won't sell you the car because your credit freaking sucks.  Now pretend you already own the car. You make payments on time on the car, but not on your credit cards, so your credit sucks. Can they take your car away? No. Not unless you start fucking up the payments on it.
Does 12A mean it's for 12 year olds? That's not all that different from many R rated films here in the USA. MPAA ratings carry **no** legal weight in the USA, and it's up to movie theaters and stores to choose to enforce the age limits.
&gt;Please don't post poll-type questions.
That is exactly what I did! I don't know for sure which variety we have, but I left one alone and it only got to about 5.5'. 7 I snipped and they got just over 6'. And 3 of them I snipped got to almost 7' (but these guys were planted right next to our garage/workshop and sheltered from wind unlike the rest which where all freestanding in the field.) I kinda wanted to buy some giberellin from this store in the city and fool around with it on the castors and other plants. 
I like my daughter Carrie to have a little bit of spirituality in her life. So when I found out that she had the curse of Blood I locked her in the closet and told her to pray for salvation. I like to think that will stick with her, and cause good warm feelings in the future.
GunZ online has gameplay that is largely based on animation glitching. It's interesting to say the least.
Well done sir. Happy Birthday. 
At university in the UK, year 2, so everyone is at least 20/21. Lecturer is struggling with 200+ students not giving a shit- really frustrating. I see a white thing about me thinking it is a pigeon (?). Someone had made a paper plane and flew it right from the back of the hall and it went allll the way to the front to the lecturers feet.
Your point was kind of clouded in a knot of jargon, but I'd like to point out the difference between the homeless and the dole scroungers. Or rather, the difference between their two means of welfare. The homeless receive their welfare from voluntary donations in the private sector, whilst the dole scrounger receives their welfare from violently enforced taxation. The scrounger takes our money and there's nothing we can do about it. The homeless receive our money on a voluntary basis.
Second this, there's a great cast of characters in that book.  Steve Eisman was easily my favorite.  I love how Micheal Lewis takes an a complex and somewhat opaque issue, finds a lot of first hand accounts and weaves their stories together in a way that explains things throughly.  I'd recommend not only his books, but also his pieces in Vanity Fair.
Not entirely relevant, but you're clearly an informed military-type. Out of the following, what would you say would give one the most valued experience for PMC jobs:  UK Army  UK Marines  French Foreign Legion  Australian Army  USMC  US Army  Police/Civilian Security work  (In case you were wondering, I'm a dual english/australian citizen who might be moving to america soon, so I view these all as viable options)  Secondly, if I was interested in working as a PMC later on should I enlist as military police? I read that it was relevant to security contracting, but also that it means you see barely any action and have extremely tedious duties.  Thirdly, is it worth pursuing a career in Special Forces if you only want to be a PMC afterwards? Obviously you would have a competitive edge in the hiring process, but would the gap between an 11B and an 18B be massive?  Finally, thank you, great AMA, and thank you for your service to the rest of us as a marine.
i can fit twice this amount one at a time
Wal-Mart is a retailer, not a showbiz entertainer. Now, if you insist on carrying out the analogy, then you have to assume that Larry would have his own network, and pay his entertainers well below guild wage, in fact, he would have to make them leave SAG altogether.  This analogy doesn't work well though, does it?  Of course, if you are only saying that Wal-Mart, too, has found a niche, then I must applaud them as well.  I went there yesterday and bought a heating pad for my wife and it was relatively inexpensive.  The customer service was atrocious, of course, but I knew that going in.  Are you saying that Larry's jokes are unfunny like Wal-Mart's service is unreliable?  In that I guess we can agree.  Of course, they're both in it for the money, so I still don't see the problem.  I'm sorry, try as might, I cannot get your analogy to work.  Perhaps my logic is too bullheaded.  Were you trying to go a different way, maybe?  Please explain your analogy fuller, so as I might be able to understand where you are coming from.
He CHOOSES not to be violent, but has the urge to do violence.  I understood what he meant.   You think pacifists never get mad?
As someone who is (usually) a Player Character, I really like Tirdun's and Corjin's examples.  They're both good examples of dealing with PC brashness harshly, but without TPK.   In the past, I have been one of those Combat-oriented players, charging in and hitting everything because "My DM wouldn't give me a badguy I couldn't defeat!"  When forced into Int rolls to make the 'smarter' decision, I always felt railroaded. The one time I had a DM thrash the party to within an inch of their lives really made me stop and remeasure the whole charge/chat aspect of encounters.
The database that runs out of the filesystem?  Sometimes I don't know why people take other people's advice seriously.  It's not like this would be hard to benchmark.  Databases run under wildly differing conditions and at wildly differing speeds.
That tutting will haunt that person for the rest of their day. In that respect our emotional defences are as weak as our weaponry.
You fail to show what harm it does, and what difference does it make that it doesn't agree with your own endeavors? This isn't /r/flip69.  The post wasn't meant to ego or karma-boost. Evidently you're mad that people are interested in the subject. Or maybe you're just mad that people want to experience DMT?  You're starting to remind me of those people that latch onto a local band, then when they get popular, you start shitting on everyone that likes the mainstream band because you liked the local band first.
This was the kind of event I have a lot these days where I hear a fantastic song, find out it's a remix, hear the original and balk. 
Has the thought ever occurred to you that you may be commiting the same crime as the 'other guy that reads reddit'? Perhaps it doesn't matter that you're good at explaining the jokes, but they are just saying 'what' out of obligation too.
also: http://techcrunch.com/2010/03/11/consumer-reports-says-apple-has-the-best-tech-support-acergatewayemachines-the-worst/  can't get a link to the exact page on consumer reports because you have to be a paid subscriber. Apple has won consumer reports #1 spot for 10 years running now
Her vision seems to be peacocks.
If you're really serious about going to law school, go retake the LSAT until you get into the range necessary to get into a top 15 school.  In the meantime, look for work in a field you're interested in and think LONG and HARD about your decision.  It may be a good fit for you, but even if it is, retaking the LSAT and getting around 170 or above will completely change your career trajectory.  If you can't get into a top 15 school, I'd recommend not going to law school.  At least until the market picks up, which could be many years from now.
I don't know their pricing, but Harolds in Lewisville does quality work and has experience with quality timepieces.
I should have updated the bios when I had windows going, but need to see if I can do it in linux, I was scared it would shut down in the middle and brick it. (would that brick it?  I need to pick up a can of air and try that, I wanted to buy a small compressor for when I fix pcs, (goodness knows 1 can of air is not always enough for some of those out there}, but I was told they could have to much moisture in them and mess up electronics. I live in TX so the air it would be compressing is already very humid.
my first sex ed was in sixth grade (elementary) with a middle aged dude for a teacher who was obviously very uncomfortable the whole time... then he opened himself up by asking for anon questions written and put in a box, so the boys proceeded to torture the poor guy with things like "what's a boner?" for over an hour..  
Giving a child a decent life isn't a favor, it's a responsibility. 
Right! Because they use numbers like Trillion or quadrillion.  Why not use the real numbers that they use instead of the ones you pull out of your ass if you will like what the politicians say is untrue.  Let the real number speak for themselves instead of making shit up.
[Bibio?](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=K-I6_aoKglQ)
Thanks! Arranging the shiatsu through the hotel hadn't occurred to me at all, that appeals a great deal more than the idea of wandering into a random parlor.   I've got 7 to 10 days planned in Kyoto to see things in town and to do day trips in the region.   I think I may get a room at Haneda Excel for the last night in Japan to avoid having to take a taxi in the middle of the night.
The next "droid incredible" in your scenario is going to be the batch of 8x60 HTC devices.  They are going to be dual core 1.2ghz beasts with an adreno 220 (which is a GPU that 4x more powerful than the one in your droid incredible).  The first one, the HTC Pyramid, should be out this summer for tmobile.
the problem is to find the Ksp of a reaction. this is set up simply by [A]*[X]. in this case, [A]=[X]=3.42e-4 +- 0.23e-4. so i need to square 3.42e-4 +- .23e-4  edit: i know how to get the 3.42 part to square, i just dont know what to do with the std dev when i combine the two nubmers
People are completely ignoring culture and its effects on society.  People are also ignoring the effects of mass global communications, which means that we are basically one large group now.  I actually think that given our level of technology including communications, "its in our genes" is a complete cop-out that overprivileged use to justify gross inequality.  The problems are related to the fundamental assumptions and institutions of our civilization.  
What miracle cream are you using that turns "hundreds of years" into a few grey hairs?  Anyway, I'm sure I read about Chell being in an Aperture Science stasis field, similar to the one Gordon Freeman was in.
**I'm not a feminist, but ...** I am disturbed by the way in which the intersectionality of multiple oppressive social structures acts to reinforce the devaluing of people of non-normative identities and public personas, especially with regard to gender performativity and the policing of gender roles.  (True story.)
I am mentally and emotionally scarred by the gonorrhoea nodule.
Therefore they do not get enjoyment? You're an idiot, and you need to quit speaking out of your ass.
Ah I c. Well good work sir. 
I make games. Professional interest and abject curiosity. I also get a thrill out of watching modern COD things similar to how I imagine most people feel about staring at a train wreck.  A financially successful, popular train wreck, but a train wreck nonetheless.
oh shit.
[](/lol)
That looks like a dungeon. Did it have a block in the center with little flame effects all over it?
I have to learn to sing this song.
Odd coincidence that the sentencing judge's name is David Hamilton, which is also the name of a [photographer/filmmaker](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/David_Hamilton_(photographer)) best known for erotic imagery of young girls.
SHITNADO
Lived there from the age of 1 til 19. Although I did enjoy living downtown. Salem Cinema was always great, plus classic film series at the Elsinore.
Great input. I'd love to speak to your friend, even if he's not interested in writing original content for us, it'd be great to hear from someone who's got some experience, and I think I could probably learn a lot from him.   100% on par with you on obstructive ads. Nothing angers me more than having advertisements fly all over the screen when I'm trying to read. About flash, however. We were thinking of using a basic flash or javascript "Featured Articles" much like IGN. It would be unobstructive, but it would show off our latest and greatest articles. Do you consider things like that a nuisance? It would only be on the main page.  Thanks again for the great points.
I disagree that I've been effectively refuted.  I would agree that there are more here that disagree with me than agree, but I don't feel that makes me wrong.  I tend to view those that disagree with me as simply misunderstanding, because I really do think if people understood where I was coming from they would be much more receptive.  If you carefully reread all of this discussion, and the ones I've had with others (though I doubt anyone will do so, I wouldn't either), you'd actually see I never really asserted much of anything.  I started from a point of being "conflicted" and "taking issue".  That didn't mean I was in disagreement so much as I was wary of some of the precedents being set.  Some people really disagree with me, and I respect that, but it is lame that sometimes the collective reading comprehension is less than I would prefer.  I specifically used the word conflicted to denote that I was not necessarily against the action.  Words have meanings and I would prefer that the weight and meaning of this word that I chose shine through, but it didn't.  I think dissent in this sort of discussion is invaluable, especially with someone who generally agrees with you otherwise.  Others don't value it as highly, and that is unfortunate.  I think a constant dialogue and self-critique makes for a stronger argument and delivery.
They have made a mistake - they have 'newsperson' next to his name instead of actor.
Great article. Troy Williams is one cool cat.  
&gt; Also, why haven't the zerg wiped out all critters that they've come across? I thought their whole MO was to destroy all life useless to the swarm and to assimilate the rest into the swarm.  I don't remember reading this part, and it doesn't make that much sense anyway.  
That better include Rocko's Modern Life.
 sudo -k
UNCOVERED BREASTS ON A WEBSITE? CALL THE AUTHORITIES OF WHO GIVES A SHIT.
Yeah, like when they ask your opinion about it but a simple yes/no answer wont work and you're totally busted for not having listened to a single word.
context?
I believe a lot of the men wear chuck taylors or bare foot. 
I'm not sure if something like this exists already, but how about hooking your IDE into a remote shell? That way, I wouldn't have to take the time to ensure that my development environment is exactly the same as my testing/deployment environment, because it's actually using the testing/deployment environment.
I might have said that if this chick knew me at all. This was our first exchange and her ability to label people based on one sentence kind of prevent any further exchange.
You should be getting her number BECAUSE you already have plans for meeting up.  Think ahead. Find common ground right away, then invite her out to do said activity involving common ground, like an art gallery or biking together. I usually throw in something like "If you're going to flake, just let me know now so I can invite someone else". She usually says something like "OH no! I'll be there." In her mind, she's already committed herself to hanging out with you again with 100% certainty.  Then..."Let me get your number for just in case something comes up"
I've had them replace quite a few things unexpectedly (including a Macbook battery and 2 iPhone screens) completely for free.  Apple is an amazing company.
Because they want to control thought and discussion in America.  Glad I could clear that up for ya.
no, there is
Officer Collins: [addressing military brass about Rita's background] We did, however have to come to an arrangement with her pimp. A gentleman who goes by the name Upgrayedd. Which he spells thusly, with two D's, as he says, "for a double dose of this pimping". http://www.imdb.com/title/tt0387808/quotes
Second day.  First day of the month is New Porn Day.
teracopy integrates with explorer to handle the file action verbs by default - that gives you more control but not without a few bugs.  win7 will continue doing stuff in the background and just stack up the questions for you to look at at the end, doesn't help if it's a big folder halfway down the list though.
The problem is that most soldiers have feelings too. Some don't get used to the feeling of shooting somebody and are equally disgusted by what they are forced to do. Becoming numb to it is not an easy process for those soldiers who aren't mal-adjusted psychopaths. Your "opinion" makes you come off as sounding like you think you are morally superior to them by your choice of not becoming a soldier and potentially being put in the situation of having to make a potentially bad, morally ambiguous choice. That is a repugnant thing to claim. Some soldiers with strong mental constitutions are able to process and "put away" their guilt about killing someone who may have been completely innocent (this doesn't necessarily mean they are psychopaths), but many don't.   I think you should think about it a bit more from the perspective of a morally-conscientious, perhaps idealistic soldier; many exist (perhaps not enough) and honestly went over to Iraq and Afghanistan to help (as misguided as their intentions may or may not be from your perspective), not to kill people. Obviously, being made to do so has varying effects from soldier to soldier, even in clear-cut cases of self-defense, and you shouldn't make blanket statements about every soldiers moral character. 
You're kidding. So for, what, $250 per month per car * 3 cars they are "spreading the mileage around" with a system that gives absolutely NO return. The money they are spending on these leases is literally being flushed down the toilet.  OR they could spend their $750 a month toward the loan of a new car (which is covered under the same warranty as all leases for all but the most shitty of cars), drive the hell out of it, then sell it and get part of their investment back. Am I missing something obvious? Because it seems like all signs point to leases being a total ripoff for anyone with half-decent credit.
People are already penalized for making false police reports. These would be no different.
I thought you paid the bills! Explains why the power's been out…
BY NOTCH'S BEARD, MINE IT ALREADY!
This makes it so less annoying to pressurize yourself when scuba diving.  My instructors or guides would always get nervous when they didn't see me doing the hold-your-nose-and-blow method and thought my ears were going to pop
&gt; Let the downvotes commence.  You can't really pretend to not know how anti-Facebook the hivemind is.
I was embarrassed that he represented my country when I had just had the best hospitality I've ever received in Thailand.  I'm in total agreement with you. 
I am critical to patriotism (in general, not only here in Germany) and I am not left wing and not that young any more.   However I don't mind flags on cars and in windows every two years.  
Thats awesome! I knew I was gonna get some real mindblowers.
...Canned guinness *shivers*
here are my best thoughts on a more representative system. im not interested in blaming the "next" leader, not fair since they don't get the voices of the citizens organized for them (and everyone)  http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/fpjdq/open_source_government_open_voting/  but also not fair that citizens don't get their fair say on tons of laws, job security and a fair life, etc, etc.  they can always direct the traffic akin to how cable has been for dumbing down the populace.   my buddy the other day told me something i found interesting:  were hanging out at his place, watching some show and he said how do you know whatever is happening over in some foreign nation is really happening as it's told when only 5 media guys own the networks?  and so I agrued about the net and about multiple sources, etc, etc. but he then said:  "how do you know the first people who told the initial story are telling all those contacts the truth?".  sure got me thinking about history books written by victors, how manipulating the data can change things a lot.   anyways, i'm just replying b/c i like yer "be some serious change in our system" attitude!  but as for stopping it, they are like God /w that much power! Damn right they can stop/flatten whomever they want atm. 
That's an average speed. There's a certain probability of an atom in a gas having a certain speed, but that's the average. It's called the Maxwell-Boltzmann distribution if you want to look it up.
Just updated from CM6.1 to CM7 on the EVO when they hit RC1. I had to do the GPS Fix, but other than that it has been working great so far.
As someone else said, reddit lets you mask your urls anyway. There is absolutely no reason to use those url shortening services for reddit comments, and while I'm not attacking you personally I always make a point of disputing it.
Yeah okay Beaker, I think my alpha-neuron interface is taking a shit right now unfortunately
Upon seeing this image, I literally said "oh, shit!"  Well done, sir, and thank you for sharing you work.
yeah what this guy said.
we're not talking about spoken english. we're talking about written english... which is well.. english..  I wonder if I could make a variant of german and remove all the "ë"
LUNCH
My friend in 5th grade told me that I could pee in a girls peehole, and that would get her pregnant. Hurray for no proper sex ed!
You can't tell me what to do.  You're not my dad!
wow, when is this movie coming out?  Can't wait to see it!
actually i called bullshit on it and i was right, i knew this wasnt legit
HAHA,  IM USING IT TO SPEED UP MY AFTER EFFECTS RENDERS. LOL. I KNOW HOW TO USE IT. PROBABLY BETTER THAN YOU.
&gt;Shame them, embarrass them  these things will get you in a ton of shit at school and possibly out of school if the bully complains.  Bad advice.
They look beautiful. Ever considered messing around with photography? 
That's basically all it is. A little bonus thank you (at the take-out counter). If you're sitting down it's pretty much obligatory unless your server like punched you in the face or something.
He yelled **after** the homeless guy told him "Fuck off, it's mine.", so yelling was justified.
I made one, but I've got a specific use for it that's more than "X has achieved Y!". Once I've got everything up and running, I might post it on the /r/rift reddit, but right now it's in it's infancy.
Oh right, thanks.
It saddens me that we have massively over-achieved in our war making ability (compared to their impressions) and failed just about everywhere else.  Heh.
http://i.imgur.com/0ETiK.jpg  Sorry you may have to turn you head to look at it, I'm posting this from my phone and can't edit it.
&amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;
If you can get your hands on it I would suggest a copy of The Blind Watchmaker by Dawkins instead of The God Delusion.  It has more awesome science and is a bit lighter on the religion bashing. "Atheism, it just makes sense*." *provided you take the time to learn and understand science and logical fallacies. Edit: Even when living in a very religious part of Texas I managed to find a good group of atheist friends.  So don't worry I'm sure you can either reason with your current set of friends or find friends who will accept you.
Hmm. Well, they did no sound in space, and, uh, had all the planets in one solar system (thus making the travel distances only sort of implausible as opposed to...we need warp drive). And...that's about it. Whedon does realism and believability alright, but a lot of the choices he makes are stylistic or for telling the story. Still, yeah, there are a lot of other shows that engage in way more techno-magic.   Frankly, Firefly probably belongs on the History channel, since it was inspired by a book about the civil war. But whatever, I love it, so any attention it gets is good. 
I have a theory.  A theory deserved of the Nobel Prize if you ask me.  There are two kinds of fatty.  - There are ***Happy Fatties***. - There are ***Crappy Fatties***. - There are no in-between fatties.  Happy Fatties look like [this](http://www.canadianactors.info/John_Candy.jpg).  They are nice, fun, happy. Crappy Fatties look like [this](http://static.tvtropes.org/pmwiki/pub/images/fat-bastard.jpg).  The are fat, ugly, nasty.  My wife laughs at me about this theory.  But secretly she agrees too.  Unfortunately, the Crappy Fatties are slowly outbreeding the Happy Fatties.  I don't know why.  There were much more Happy Fatties around when I was young.  Maybe it's the water.  Or the ice-cream.
Pretty dumb, especially since you blew up pretty much all offensive weapons of the ship prior to.  I just continuously tapped R1/R2 and cleared it on veteran on my second try.
I'm not sure if you're referring to pro-life women who receive abortions, or my own argument in this post.  If you *are* referring to my argument, I'd point out in my defense that my second post is simply a clarifying restatement of my first.  If you aren't, well... a thousand pardons and please disregard.
you only change your shorts once a year?
When installing Windows 7 on my girlfriend's dad's computer last year, I noticed he had Civ 4 and all the expansions under the desk.  So for Christmas, I decided to get him a bunch of other games that he might like along those lines, figuring he was sort of casual.  He looked quite happy on Christmas morning opening up Alpha Centuri and Pharaoh, but he looked a little unfufilled.  Later when we were talking - and knowing full well that I'm a huge gamer - he mentioned to me, "Hey, did you know that Civ 5 just came out?"  It was only at this point I realized what a huge gamer was actually lurking.  He knew more about the game than I did!  The next day, I went out and bought him a new video card, PSU, and a copy of Civ 5.  I must say I am very pleased (and somewhat alarmed) that he's maintained a Steam rating of 10 since then.
Could be an idea to tag this slightly NSFW in case.
every year until the deficit starts to be reduced....if i recall the GOP budget barely makes a dent in the deficit
Black, one very excessively small teaspoon of sugar, and a pinch of salt. The salt kills all the bitterness. I will never drink my coffee any other way, and I used to drink it like a 15 year old girl.
Now, IF they had a historian commenting on the factual accuracy or similarities between Larry the Cable Guy and *actual* history (like how they're giving an actual physicist a voiceover role to comment on the factual accuracy or similarities with Firefly and hard science), THEN we probably wouldn't rage. In fact, if The Learning Channel gave scientific professionals a voice-over track for their Sara Palin show, that would be **funny as heck** and I would watch the ***crap*** out of that, man!
I like the thematic color scheme your team has goin' on.
** Do the standard checks first, which others here will recommend, remove battery, etc etc.**  *** IF NO OTHER ADVICE HERE HELPS FIRST***   Your symptoms sound like the common GPU fault that exists....  I looked up the model and it's part of the large amount of laptops suffering the same problem:  Check out my fairly length post here: http://www.reddit.com/r/techsupport/comments/f43cp/laptop_freezing_vertical_lines_black_screen_and/  Also check out: http://en.kioskea.net/forum/affich-35186-hp-pavillion-dv6000-graphic-card-problem  Symptoms my laptop had when it had this problem: Laptop would turn on, lights would come on. The BACKLIGHT of the screen lit up, if I remember right, but nothing comes up on the screen. Laptop will beep, fan spin, but nothing comes on screen. Before this happens, frequent crashes / graphical glitches may also occur. The 'blanket' fix in the second link I posted is a pretty decent test to see if this is the issue really, there's a slight change of it causing more damage, but it's not that likely (The laptop should shut itself off when it gets too hot, but this should be hot enough to help fix it. Might be a good idea to remove the HDD etc first though)
huh?
I thought Pokemon was with BK...
Almost Live!!  I actually hadn't seen that particular clip before.  Town is very cheesy, too crowded in the winter, too hot in the summer.  It's also fun and the scenery is gorgeous.  Check out the Gingerbread House if you're there and you like gingerbread, theirs is great.
Christians and Muslims consider themselves normal or reasonable people as well. The atheist label may do harm, but it also does the good of letting the religious know that we are different, and they can be too.
American football is considerably popular in Japan.  So much so that Japan won the 1999 and 2003 [World Cup of American Football](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/World_Cup_of_American_football).  Japan steamrolled over its opponents in the group stage, scoring 96 points and allowing 0. 2007 was the first year that the US sent a team.  No NFL or CFL players were selected, only amateurs from NCAA divisions I, II, and III. The final was USA vs. Japan, and it was a hell of a game.  The US entered the 2nd quarter up 7-0, but Japan scored 10 unanswered points, including a 49 yard field goal, to go up 10-7 at the half.  The Americans managed a third quarter field goal, but found themselves trailing again when Japan scored a touchdown with 7:00 left in the 4th.  After an 80 yard drive, the Americans tied the game up with less than 3 minutes to go.  The 4th quarter ended 17-17.  OT1: Both teams score field goals on their posessions.  OT2: On Japan's field goal attempt, one of the US defenders gets a fingertip on the ball, sending it bouncing off the goalpost.  The US chipped in a field goal to secure victory, 23-20.   TL;DR:  Japan is pretty good at football, the USA team narrowly beat them in a come-from-behind victory.
Dae think X-files when they read "cancer mon"?
I think there is something about women's genetic makeup that makes it harder for them to lose weight.
dude that would suck,  i just broke my tailbone shredding yesterday
[And the number of pirates has gone down too!](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:PiratesVsTemp_English.jpg)  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Correlation_does_not_imply_causation
The deniers wouldn't be convinced even if the entire surface of the planet were transformed into one big desert.   To them, it's all about politics—admitting that climate change is real would be a loss for their side and a win for the other side.  
um, wow
The proper term is "Saber" but it's an American film with American terms so it's "Sabre"
How considerate of them, I might have a sudden change of heart about that Pier 1 Imports newsletter.
grounded for life
It's considered bad form to wear outdoor clothes indoors because it's like saying you're just waiting to leave.
I agree, it's really creepy.
This is the internet, are you sure you want to say that?
Sorry dude, I didn't mean to make it sound like I spoke for the entire website (although I feel like that should go without saying).  I assume that what you were talking about is the social/fiscal divide in conservatism, although it appears I can't rely on my assumptions today.  When you refer to yourself as conservative, and show resentment towards people such as myself who throw the term around as a synonym for "Christian Right," you appear to be putting yourself under the banner of Social Liberal/Fiscal Conservative, which *I and maybe others I don't know I don't speak for anyone but me* would refer to as a Libertarian.  IF THAT'S THE CASE AND OF COURSE IT MAY NOT BE, you're probably more pissed off at these d-bags than I am, so I don't know why you're angry.  Please help me understand you, lolrsk8s.
odly enough my volvo is having the same issue since i just did a motor swap. Its throwing a temp sensor code, and the gauge goes to warm way too early...so i think my problem is that the car is confused to what temp the motor is. Starts cold really well,  then idles like shit until it warms up, and cant start if its anything but hot or cold.  so, maybe try swapping the temp sensor. But check which one it is, some cars have a temp sensor for the dash and one for the ECU...and maybe other configurations too. It might not be broken enough to throw a code or something...i dont knows much bout dem 'merican cars
Click "formatting help" that is in the bottom right of your reply message. It has everything you want to know.  Enjoy.
I didn't *give up* anything. I want my rights to privacy. I didn't imply otherwise.   &gt;you are willing to give it up because you think it would be politically inconvenient.   You didn't even read the part in my response where I stated that even though your impossible expectation being met would dry your tears, the problem won't go away. I bet my hard earned money for the next decade that if someone were to list the amount of loopholes and tricks that would allow them another way to undermine our rights to habeas corpus, we'd have new wallpaper for a city block's worth of homes. Look, all I'm saying is: Don't pretend like **no one** supports this thing. You and I may not agree with it, but it's still there because of them. The PATRIOT Act will die with America's paranoia with terrorism (regardless of how any president feels), and not a moment before.
Jay Cutler.
Having ads show up on your screen is not the same as paying and entitles you to exactly nothing.
I agree. Its like when they make fun of Cheney because he accidentally shoot his find in the face. "Thats why you don't like the guy?! I bet he he must feel horrible about that", unlike all the people he had falsely imprisoned, tortured or worse...and the preemptive war based on lies...
So it's the Mexicans fault amirite?  /s (I'm Mexican) No &amp;#3232;\_&amp;#3232;'s please.  
Infect replaces each point of damage with a poison counter for players or a -1/-1 counter for creatures; if you attack or otherwise damage a Planeswalker, the damage is dealt normally because infect doesn't mention a replacement effect in that event.
Get on it. Retail outlets have dried up and can't restock.
Well, yes and no. I thought the best solution would indeed be a VoIP-based setup, but all the providers I found looked rather shady... I wouldn't have "trust" in voip.ms without any recommendation from someone actually using it ...
OP asked if you "attended", not did you graduate. If you attended, feel free to upvote. 
source by any chance?
no problem.  while i'm not in favor of this policy, i do think that redditors tend to vastly overstate the issue when they paint it as making it "OK to assassinate American citizens".  that makes it sound like the government is now allowing themselves to kill anybody at will for any reason, and i think this situation is a little more complicated than that.  but i do link to it anytime i see someone asking, because it is an important story and everyone should form their own opinion on it.
John Heffron has a great bit about this.
Yes, probably, but the point still stands.
The case has 2 fans and the option to add 5 [more](http://www.overclockers.co.uk/showproduct.php?prodid=FG-000-XI). Your video card already has a fan and is cooled with air from outside the case. Add more fans to cool the entire system if you're planing on overclocking but afaik the gpu is safe.
3d maze with ladders and stuff everywhere!
I actually think Boston made a decent deal. They know it will be tough to get out of the East and this trade gives them more help on the perimeter when they face Miami or the Bulls. I think this also shows how little respect (and rightly so) they have for the Bosh, the magic besides Dwight, and Amare.
How many Courics was it when you finally made it happen?
Well it still answers at least half of the reason why they will not riot. The demands of people rioting usually have a desired result and that result has to be achievable. There are few if any in the US that could make this happen even if they wanted to. So who we would riot against would be hard to determine. Then of course is the other catalyst of rioting which has no rational base to it what-so-ever. There is no way to predict that.
hickory smoked horse butthole... *from a cup*
[](/yuno) Y U NO TELL ME ANSWER?!
To bad it isn't at an optimal size for a 1920x1080 res wallpaper...Would have to distort to much :&lt;
I'm pretty sure you've got your percentages all wrong and it's 100% of furries that are fucking terrible.
I have not! It looks interesting, though. I'll have to check that out. 
Yeah, I'm slowly improving. As for the beginning, my game lags like hell at the start (I play on a MacBook, usual Mac inefficiency stuff, whine about trackpad), but I probably was still slow on that.
Sorry, yes, I meant Edmonton, Alberta, not Alberta, Canada.
I hope this question doesn't disappear in a sea of trolling...  Why is the acting on "tween" shows like "iCarly" and "Victorious", as well as "Suite Life", "Wizards of Waverly Place", "House of Anubis" and others, so *over the top*?  My theory is that it has to appeal to the most developmentally diverse demographic (7-8 to 13-14) and has to have some of the didactic spoon-feeding of traditional "children's" programming (Barney, The Wiggles et al) as well as relatability to teens and pre-teens in the most awkward time of their lives... but I fear that it is actually to condition the viewer to accept, and even expect, mediocrity in entertainment products  Kudo's on being able to entertain your demographic so well, my youngest son absolutely loves your shows and would sit and watch them 24x7 if we let him... but now he likes to emulate the histrionics that the actors go through on your shows, and it is a little maddening at times.
I too have a main lift for everyday I workout, I just never thought that doing over 12 reps is as effective as doing say 7-10 at about 75%.
Other than sustaining businesses that just don't "get it?"  Not much other than having something handy to put in the bottom of the bird cage or wrapping fish in.  They serve the same purpose, now, as telephone directory books.  Nostalgia.
&gt; I don't feel any challenge  Ok, then. [Do this](http://www.yogacards.com/yoga-postures-2/crane-pose-bakasana-side.html)
Yeah, with all due respect to Cristiano, I don't think he's more 'complete' than Messi. Just because Messi doesn't score as many goals with his head or from free-kicks doesn't necessarily mean he's 'less complete'. They have different skills and advantages. 
I once pissed in an empty beer bottle, then 15 minutes later my friend drinks it and I arrive just after he swallowed, then pissed it out with pure horror on his face. A win-win situation.
smoke a little weed.  
Good insight
I've always said if you're going to give someone a job, allow them access to the tools that enable them to do the job. For management, and for a lot of other positions, that means having the ability to make decisions, and perhaps even make a few bad ones, but with upper level backing. Without that, a management position that relies upon a "mother may I?" set of hierarchical constraints is really just another potential scapegoat for really lousy leadership.
Like? How about love! Flawless body and awesome on the body hair! Can't wait to see more!
I don't know where this swing is. Anyone want to help?
Oye, no.  Qué basura de imagen y mensaje. Podrías haberte esforzado un poco más.
You do realize that PC gamers can play at higher resolution than 1080 and with higher frame-rates than 30fps, right?
You're correct. It's a law. Intergalactic law.
Between the two of you?  I'd say it would be your boyfriend.
You're probably near a dungeon spawn.  See any mossy cobblestone around?
 Its awesome when eating lunch, and people just stop and stare.  Great conversation starter.
I live in East territory and one of my best friends is a Panther. I WILL NOT COME AT YOU, BRO!   Unless you want a hug
The only political standpoint that is reasonable, which is why I'm so adamant about this, is pro-choice. You and I can be personally pro-life in our decisions, but it is invasive to force that concept on everyone.   What you fail to realize is that the fetus DOES NOT, even though it is "alive" and is "human," it does NOT have any RIGHT to be inside the mother's body. Even if your body/organs were connected to another unconscious human being for 9 months, and it was by your "fault" it happened, it can only persist for that long by your PERMISSION. Not the parasite's interests, but yours. You ignore the mother's interests, and the value of her life to her. If you, the host, at anytime, wish to revoke that permission of usage of your body, then the option to remove that parasite should be available. In the case of abortion, when you remove the fetus from the body, it is unable to survive by itself. That is why it dies, not because of the removal procedure. It is because it cannot sustain itself once outside of the body of the woman. This is different from life support, because it is a machine sustaining the unconscious, not another human being. Then again, my father explicitly told me he never wanted to be on life support; should I go against his wishes because YOU think him being "alive" is more important than the quality of his life and his wishes? It is a personal choice that you, and no one else, has any matter in.   I do value human life, but I abhor suffering. Maybe it's because I've suffered some myself, but thankfully I did not have to go through a morally grey area to "fix" it. I don't think you or I have any moral upper ground to those decisions, and it varies from person to person. Either way, the fact remains abortion IS safer than going through childbirth. Falsifying that information in order to promote what you and a few people outside of the situation would personally do, is wrong. 
[I would like to have a word with you.](http://i.imgur.com/4jgcF.jpg)
my brain doesn't function like this, but maybe that's because i don't live in behaviora land...
Granted I'm glad for what it won, but does anyone find it annoying that the most clever movie this year wins for how it looks and sounds?
Its a good documentary. Quite shocking footage towards the end of mindless killings in Iraq.
100%
I'm not Ian Hands.
Is there any way to get course information? I home school my son and would love to have some guidelines in which to show all the religions/myths so he has a some concept of the major belief systems.
As much as I agree with you, it's not the song, it's the frequency. I had heard Kashmir every damned day for the first 4 weeks of one of my freelance jobs.... Murders were 3 plays away. 
Might be a stupid question, but if the game is already on your hd, why play it in a browser?
Silly you :P
...and why should anyone have to be with someone they don't find "good enough"?  Don't we all usually seek happiness and a good match?  If you're not happy with an aspect of a person (like looks), its unlikely to change. Relationships are not only emotional.
I don't know, but I'll ask. I guess it's because they own all the books. My mom has a book shelf that's three feet wide with two shelves devoted to books, players, maps, etc.
Get their sweet and sour asses in here right now before I fight you with sponge cake. 
The fattest books you have ever seen that are always covered in dust at the library and probably your room ...
Hmm, any guide on how to play Maniac Mansion on Android? (That's a SCUMMVM game right?)
If it takes a movie to figure out the hoax that is Global Warming™, You are probably using Fox as hardcore porn. It's a business, just like the 'Wars' on things: Drugs, Terror, Poverty.. All fear-based and highly funded.  
Again you demonstrate your prowess in pointing out things so obvious they need not be said.
That's what I was thinking, assuming OP has a laptop (don't colleges practically require them these days?). Mount a USB webcam on your laptop and turn it around so it faces the front of the room. You still have to worry about your laptop battery dying, but you should have a lot more recording capacity on the hard drive. Plus a webcam is cheaper than a Flip.
There are actually a few of my favorites stories.  * A large black woman came in with a large bag type purse and managed to stuff 40 cans of redbull. it went un noticed unfortunatly and the next day she tried again. My coworker was there at the time and chased her out and tackled her to the ground. mind you my coworker is 5'3 100lbs maybe, and the theif was about 250lbs heavier. the lady lost her purse and shoes in the fight but managed to get in her car and drive off.  *A vagrant crack head wandered in from the street, went to the back of the store and stuffed a full box of beef jerkey in his coat and walked out. he proceeded across the street and sat at the bus stop. the police picked him up from there  with nothing but a crack pipe and my jerkey.   theres more ill update when I get out of work.
You can also use a normal irc client to log into this.  irc.mibbit.net - #karmahorde
Stop giving bell money.
Ok, then smash the windows and scratch "mentally disabled doesn't count" into the hood with a brick.
Oh yeah, Pilgrim? Well only after you eat the peanuts out of my sheeeiiit.
Sure, anytime you do work with muscles you can build muscle.  As the article states itself this won't make you big, but it could help tone.  None of these seem unreasonable, you might look a little goofy if your the only person shadow boxing on a treadmill.
Oh fuck. I should have read first. 
It's not going to happen.  If you're standing in the path of technological progress, you're on the wrong side.  Besides, nobody important will take AI seriously until long after anything could be done to prevent it.  
Was there ever a time that you didn't realize it was diarrhea?
Wait... not only did you leave your laptop somewhere where it would get stolen, but you also left your backup of said laptop in. the. exact. same. place, and you left a folder with your social security info in. the. exact. same. place... and you want us to commiserate or sympathize? Call this a life lesson that you learned WAAAAAAAAAAAAAAAY too late.  
Fabulology!
Really?!? A down vote? I don't even know this family just trying to help. 
Well when you act stupid and beleive stupid things that have no basis, without considering other FACTS presented, then of course you should be mocked and called names, because that is what you are doing to God and his chosen ones.
Lsa?
The look that says, "Friend or foe, I am about to pounce the *shit out of you.*"
That cup of tea was amazing, the guy in the cafe also gave me an extra crumpet, presumably taking pity on me for being wet to the bone.  That was an awesome day though.
I see no real news article or anything that says this is even remotely true.  Seem more like a FML site then anything else.
I used to work for this man.  I'm not surprised in the least.  He was always very manipulative with the staff, especially the female staff.  I wish I could say that it's shocking to hear, but it isn't.  I hope he gets the help he needs for his disease in prison.
Atheists also know more about the bible than theists. 
i would delete this post.  you can get in some serious trouble for this.
I *am* a teacher! =(
No, they're martial arts shoes.  But look at the VFF, Nike Free and all those other high-priced "barefoot" running shoes.  They're just rubber soles with no cushioning or support.  That's what the Wushu's are.  Just a light rubber sole with a light canvas upper.  They've been great for helping me to transition to the barefoot style.
Mine is a little bigger than I would prefer but it still fits great for a hockey jersey. I could have gone one size smaller. It is okay cause I am sure I will eventually retire it. 
Yes he is worth more than that and the team.that bought him would easily recoup the money.
Naw, that's the kind of kid that doesn't date and it actually doesn't phase him knowing how people are. He's more of a future 'fuck that shit' regarding dating.
Maternal: Virgil and Mary Paternal: Marilyn and Herman, then Raymond
The amusing thing is that he edits anyway...
Newspaper maker has to eat too, you know. Who are we to make him find a new, actually socially relevant job?
Fuck yeah (yes).
Thats why i included the figures so that somebody else might see that, that sub is gonna die, and its gonna die quickly.   I can just imagine it now, the sub hitting a whale, resulting in the worst mammalplosion of all time.
It would just be replaced by the next big thing everyone would use but bitch about endlessly.
God created Adam and Eve not Adam and lamp! 
I never knew saving gas and/or flight dynamics was a concern to stationary buildings.
I UPVOTED AND YOU SHOULD FEEL  BAD!
Thank you!  Yep, it's me.  I wrote the song after reading the book The Snow Leopard.  I'm glad you like it!!!
do you have software that you use to do this? &lt;/intrigued&gt;
* Gattaca * The Thin Red Line (especially [Journey to the Line](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=HOFZSnz9J3s)) * Triplets of Belleville * [Tarnation](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=lkNnbHczZ5k) * [The Game](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0z-acN6PaUs&amp;feature=related) &lt;--such beautiful melancholy
OHMYGOD YOU REPLIED TO ME  now I can die
Obligatory quote from dead philosopher:  [The time you enjoy wasting is not wasted time.](http://www.quotationspage.com/quote/27605.html) Bertrand Russell
It's supposed to be a hipster circlejerk. The creator of the reddit made a post complaining about people posting music that was too ‘mainstream’. That's when I quit.
Driver was awesome for creating fuckton cop rage crashups!
If it bothers you, then remove yourself from the situation. If you're worried about the other people getting hurt... well, that's a kind thought, but there's no way for this to end well for you.  They will all end up blaming you.
Slight miscalculation.
*VEGAN POLICE*
Figure out about how many calories you burn every day (using something like [this](http://www.webmd.com/diet/healthtool-metabolism-calculator)) and then eat 400-500 calories less than that each day.  That's the simiplest way to do it.  As eric suggests, read the FAQ.  It's got lots more info.
Bingo ;) but actually it kinda is the User's fault when the User walks away from the process for *two* hours and expects Windows to behave as if it knows what the User wants it to do, in the event of a procedural exception, without the User having told it beforehand. Like i said, computers are only as smart as the User, which means, not what you imply -that the User is dumb, but that the *computer* is dumb and must be babysat.
Snakes.  Why did it have to be snakes?
120%
I'm pretty sure that the Communists/SPD weren't too far behind them though, in terms of votes. Though there's no way that the conservatives pulling the strings would have allowed a Communist victory, they were pretty popular too. Of course Hitler was popular in the beginning, even Hindenburg, who hated him on sight, was happy to have a relatively popular nationalist in power. And what German of that period wouldn't be happy to have a stable government after the Weimar Republic with it's rampant assainations and dissolving of the government roughly every 6-8 months? Can you find me a source on the "genuine and uncoerced support"? Without the need for force or fear? So, the Gestapo was in charge of handing out candy to people they didn't like? There's a great museum in Berlin at the ruins of the old Gestapo headquarters where they detail and document the public shaming and crowd psychology that the Gestapo used to intimidate people in the NS period. This was the period when you could be sent to prison just for saying negative things about Hitler, like Sophie Scholl's dad was when a neighbor denounced him to the Gestapo. The very same period when you would be beheaded for distributing pamphlets like Sophie Scholl was. I think you're underestimating the quiet, implied violence that was present in the NS period. The Gestapo, and later the Stasi were just better at their job than other totalitarians, that doesn't mean that they were less brutal, just less obvious and better at controlling public opinion. Also, the other totalitarian regimes that you mention were/are Communist, and any Nationalist government is going to be able to count on more popular support than a Communist government can. Even the Communists knew this, look at Ceausescu's desperate, last ditch bid to hold onto power through nationalist rhetoric. Edit: Sorry, I just get frustrated when I hear people talk about how popular the Nazi's were, yes, I think to a large part of the population they were popular, but how can you separate out the propaganda from what people actually thought when there was such tight, brutal control over the populace? It seems like some people like to use Nazi propaganda to say, "see, look, everyone's waving flags and marching, look at how happy they are, everyone must have been totally going along with it." which, to me, is kind of like watching Triumph of the Will and saying "wow, all of those boys in this movie are handsome and blonde, I guess every German must have looked like that back then." No, that's propaganda, and not a legitimate historical tool to gauge popularity or reality. Another point is that I think most people who were quietly against the regime just waited for the Nazi regime to collapse, which today sounds pretty naive, but people who were against Hitler and the Nazi's underestimated how well they were able to consolidate and hold onto power. I mean, if I had been an observer during that period with no knowledge of the events to come, I wouldn't have given that regime very long based on who was running it, I mean, they all looked like clowns! Also, an astute political observer would probably think back to the "Kapp Putsch", or even Hitler's own "Beer Hall Putsch" and have a pretty dim view of the Nazi's being able to hold onto their power. 
Gawker's still going? I thought it had folded like Digg.
*  ~~misogynist~~  *  ~~really funny~~  *  trying too hard to be funny
I smell a troll. Just reading through the comments from the OP has me figuratively shitting myself with laughter.
You correct the "your", but leave the "likes" to stew?  For shame, sir.  Licks*.
If you live in the USA, go to wal-mart or any pharmacy, they are in the vitamin isle. Usually you can get a small off-brand bottle for 3-4$. 
I miss my dad... [](/sadtroll)
It's even more annoying when children are dying in America because their keepers prevent them from proper medical care due to their religious beliefs.
I sorta giggled at this because my boss is a 45ish year old woman who shops at ridiculously expensive places, while I'm a mid-20s guy :P. I should show up with a coach bag or something someday.
Or drink, as the case may be.
Yes. Everyone. The lot of them are scum and are worthless to humanity as a whole.
Depends if you're frugal or not... If you're frugal you'll be happy to knock at least 1% off the price of everything you buy.
**an** epic pic. FTFY
Find some old junker for a few hundred that you can wrench on.
Some say 'The Lion King' sends a message of racism and segregation. The Hyenas are said to represent any unwanted Other, or underclass (blacks, immigrants, the poor, etc). When they are brought into the animal kingdom by Scar (made equal), they ruin everything, then we need Simba to come back to the kingdom (stop being aloof) and chase off the hyenas for everything to be good again. Some say the story is telling white/rich America to wake up to the dangers of integration and equality for the underclass.  'Twilight' reinforces a male dominated gender hierarchy, which is interesting for a film directed by a woman, written by a woman, produced by two women, and based on a book by a woman. However, I wouldn't really call this one latent, since this has been a criticism of the series since the books.  If you take a Film Theory course, this is literally ALL you; find the "hidden" meanings in film.
Thanks. I heard this the other day. I'm pretty sure it's autotuned and I don't understand why. I've heard Train before and he doesn't need digital assistance.
problem is that this build is an auto loss to 15 hatch
Hmm, while I agree with what johnwallis42 said, I'm not sure your analogy is applicable. X amount of money earned, thus Y amount of hours worked goes to your food budget, inadvertently your grocer. So saying that you work to pay the grocer... isn't that far fetched.
Mate, that's nothing, I have had 140 down and 95 up on that test in Korea!
And consumers are the ones who end up getting stung.
You clearly do not understand the nature of coercion.
well any time you aren't learning something or bettering yourself is wasted time, really.  if you're enjoying yourself that's fine but don't kid yourself.  you are wasting time when you play a video game.
Me, too! Yay, we're reddit birthday twins! :-D  I kinda like going from spikes to flowers. O:-)
Do you already have a plan to phase out the candy? Or are you dropping it cold turkey?  Let us know how it goes at the gym! :)
Just adding my 2 cents, but to the outside observer, these symbols will probably be regarded by many as Chinese, even though they can be read in Japanese.  I only say this because I don't see any proprietary "Japanese" characters.  edit: Thought the title read "My girlfriend wants ME to get a tattoo of this." My bad, disregard my last comment.
But I WANT them to knock.  Seriously I have so much fun discussing their religion with them... planting seeds.  Talked with one the other day, really made him think :)
All the permanent members utilize their veto to protect their national interests. Just so happens the US has their hands in so many places that its hard for something not to conflict with US interests.
yer serious? yer not going for humour points here? :P
When you sell a person a product on a very wide scale that you know is a "piece of shit" and could probably ruin a person financially, it's not just immoral or greedy, it's fraud and should be prosecuted.   There may have been some that legitimately thought the market would never crash but most just didn't care. If the market doesn't crash they make billions more in profits. If the market does crash they get to keep the billions they already made and the government bails the company out.  
The law of cosines can be applied to male-on-male hot tub encounters.  *c*^2 = *a*^2 + *b*^2 - 2*ab*cosγ  Where:  a=ass  b=balls  c=cock  γ=degrees you need to tilt the box of wine
Too bad she couldn't make the film alone.   Snarkiness aside, I like [her music](http://www.tanyadavis.ca/fr_music.cfm).
Nuclear rage is the best. He's so mad he's frothing lava.
&gt;I used to fantasize about killing people like you before committing suicide when I was suffering the worst side effects from propecia.  quoted in case you decide to delete your account.  &gt;I'm sorry but what about a large community of men suffering the exact same physical and mental problems "conveniently" right after taking the exact same drug is not "scientific" enough.  It's not "scientific" enough for the vaccine-autism link, and its not "scientific" enough for this.  &gt;I guess you are just waiting until Merck releases an "official" report that says "Yep, turns out our pill we made millions in profits on actually was ruining lives, sorry about that guys."  No I'm waiting to see any valid scientific evidence at all.  &gt;A toddler can see the cause and effect  It's funny you say that, because the fact people misjudge cause and effect based on anecdotal evidence is the reason vaccinations rates have declined and [toddlers have died needlessly as a result.](http://www.msnbc.msn.com/id/40280560/ns/health-infectious_diseases/)  Even though your emotional rejection of scientific importance is exactly the same as that which has killed those other children, I don't fantasize about killing people like you. I feel sorry they're so obsessed with their own emotional reactions that they're willing to let their own children die as a result.
"I'd kill you but I'm going to need that mouth later." Oh, if I only had a dollar every time I've said that to a girl.
Unless you like old man wang.
I've got to ask, and no offense intended, do you get much pleasure from spending most of your day posting in r/askreddit?
Cool UI / art. Looking forward to giving it a spin.
our senses are indeed quite limited, as there are several wavelengths of light and sound that cannot be detected by our biological sensory tools.  but what, praytell, requires an entity to be supernatural in order to (eventually) master nature (i say eventually as it is painfully obvious that humans have not yet grasped the basics of what little power we exert upon our environment and ourselves). If you can think it, discover it, use it to manipulate or otherwise affect your world, is it not natural? is it not contained in nature?
actors take pictures too?!!!!!
ugly ass pants
I'm a software engineer. 4-5 years ago I had a boss from Turkey. One day he comes into my office confused... "Waxoff what is this database called 'da-shiz-nit'?" He was equally baffled by the concept of a 'liquid lunch' that lasts ALL afternoon.
Walker will have his way, it's getting old and the ones suffering are the out of school children and the parents having to take off of work! Let it end already, get on with your lives!
I think she will be a little bit bigger in six weeks. 
Anyone else think it's hilarious all the comments are from 'anonymous' users
When I listening to the second song I was like WOAH Vikernes is stepping this up a notch! But then I realised it's those other Vargs
Yeah, I'll take The Simpsons or King of the Hill, any day.  Humor should emanate from and revolve around *characters*, instead of just being the product of propping up two-dimensional caricatures that only serve as springboards for jokes. And really, how many times can you have Peter do the whole "Hey Lois, remember that time I &lt;fill in the blank with obscure pop culture reference&gt;?" shtick. Again, Family Guy can be funny, but in a really showy way that displays an annoying and almost and oppressive degree of cleverness. It's like having a conversation with someone who's too funny, the type who replies to *everything* with a one-liner. It's tiresome after a while.
Subsidies are silly.
5% bio is safe at the normal 10k interval. If you're desire is to go higher, you will need to change the oil more frequently to avoid oil dilution.   Also you'll gain around 3 mpg by removing the emissions system. Something about that DPF that irks me.
If you couldn't travel in countries where you didn't speak the language there would be A LOT less travellers. Just do some research about your destination, buy a guidebook if you're worried, and take a chance. 
"We're not your personal army. " Is the most likely response, followed by 4chan hacking it and doing far worse damage.
Not trolling.  Just saying that contemporary philosophy is not as scientific or atheistic as it gets, because it can't "get."  It just is.  You and I are the same mind as the subjects in ancient history, apes, mammals, etc.  Emerson still remains.
The third link is the first that I have seen that actually has some authority, thanks.   [Here is the direct link to the statement](http://www.statistics.gov.uk/CCI/nugget.asp?ID=954&amp;Pos=1&amp;ColRank=2&amp;Rank=224) by the National Statistical Office. (at the bottom).   Despite that I *still* don't think it smart to put Jedi. Hmm, I notice that people who put 'other religion' were counted as 'no religion'. That doesn't seem right to me. It's actually better to count what was really there IMHO.
Its like weaboos but UK in place of Japan.  So instead of anime its watching Doctor Who constantly, making homemade chip butties, ordering bangers, calling smokes fags, getting way to into football(normal) or cricket(freak).  I must say they I would take an Anglophile over a weeaboo any day, because at least most Anglophiles are part British.
Wait a second...that's not Nosepass.
I appreciate the comments, but know that I don't have any real agenda here. I'm simply interested in what job seekers who are struggling have to say.  I don't disagree here, a college degree does not guarantee you success of any kind, but people looking to start their professional careers in a stagnant job market and having a hard time doing so is still my primary focus here.
Wearing your hat indoors is a sign of disrespect.   Doing so when you know better, especially so.   Its not the man trying to keep you down - taking off your hat is a sign of class that represents you well.
It's too hot for a penguin to be just walking around. 
Uhhhhhh, yeah I get what *you* mean. But that's not the story of Robin Hood. In Robin Hood the rich deserved it and Robin, an individual who in most stories was also fucked by the government, was a hero. That's not the type of scenario you were implying people were advocating.  Robin wasn't an evil government ransacking the rich unjustly for all their money to distribute it to people who don't deserve it. Which is what it seems you were implying with your analogy. Find a new analogy. This one is stupid. I'm sure you've heard others use it. You guys need to stop.  
By your own logic (from above), "that doesn't mean they're any good". 
I never have any trees... But I do have hospitality! And money to buy trees. So yeah we can totally smoke up and then karate chop some shit.
UWS Parra Grad '07 here and I was pretty much in the same situation when I was there. There were quite a few dopes and full fee paying internationals with a tenous grip on english and what constitutes plagiarism, but you'll find that pretty much anywhere.   When I was there campus life &amp; social clubs were pretty much non-existent and about the only thing the student union did for their $300 a semester was give you a 5% discount on the overpriced canteen food and stale beer and put movies on the projector at lunch time. The UWS union had an overhall after I left though so it could be better now.  I was working full time while I studied full time however so I spent alot of time either working or on the phone between classes and didn't hang around campus much because of that. Also because the campus became a ghost town during classes.  That being said, academically I had some really great Professors and Lecturers while I was there (Business Degree). I'd recommend trying to make friends with the people who actually want to learn and do well because group work is hell when you're stuck with people who either don't care or just don't understand the material.  They have also done alot of new construction around the campuses and especially at Parra so the facilities are miles ahead of the converted hospital rooms that I started off in. But if you don't like it you can always look into ways to transfer.  Also, any time I have had to catch a bus from 'wonderful' old Ermo the driver has been a complete douche nozzle.  TLDR: Socially UWS wasn't the best, learning &amp; facilities-wise it's quite good.
look up in minepedia ambiance
Four Rooms!
See Tearnov, you have 172 upvotes and 53 comments (at this point). I told you r/codbo was the place for your post :) (He originally posted in r/gaming and was completely ignored).  Viva r/codbo!
One week is the magic number.  After a course of antibiotics, 7 full days of pill taking, and she will be covered. Its the same for everything - missing days, switching brands, anything that interrupts her pill taking. 7 full days, and you've got your maximum efficiency back.
The entire game of TF2 is just a playable version of Red vs. Blu
Sounds like a lot of rationalizations on your part, actually.  &gt;In his accounting of violence, he forgets that most violence towards woman is done by men. It is the broken window fallacy. Men create violence towards women, and in response women want protection. Breaking windows and charging for their replacement isn't sound economics, it's extortion.  Dangerous argument. "Men" don't. Criminals do. As a man who doesn't create violence against women, what responsibility does he have? None. Men are not some sort of hive mind collective. We are not responsible for this and do not need to "step up," much as women do not need to step up as a collective for paternity fraud and the like-- which if you'd like to get specific who does it, is a 100% female perpetrated crime.  &gt;Yes, it is an act of non-action. And so is failing to hit the brakes when a child runs in front of your car. Or neglecting to lock a gun.  False equivalency. In these instances, you would be an active actor. Your negligence would be actually criminal in the case of the gun, and in the case of the child you would be a perpetrator of a crime. Failing to protect a random woman is not criminal as you were not an active actor in any harm that came to her if someone else were attacking her.  The one with bad logic is you.
Good video. You should start a series of these and make the vids longer.   Then you would just need a sidekick like mike Ross and you have a hit 
is it the clicking nails that bothers you, or do you think it looks unprofessional?  i get my nails done, but they also protect my fingertips from getting beaten to death on the keyboard.
Crossfire is my least favorite GSL map. It's still great, but some of the others are just miles ahead of it in my opinion.   ICCup map is fucking glorious though.
I'm still waiting for that great American revolution.
Thanks for the post.
Can you provide more details about how they function? A lot of us only hear of, say, Russian orphanages as homes for parentless children and they are far less than ideal.
Can someone please explain the "shot first" thing to me? I never got it, seeing as I've never watched a star wars film.
This was kind of a rude thing I did quite by accident.  I was walking across the street during a busy part of the day.  A homeless guy came up to me showing handful of change.  I was trying to get across the street before the light turned red, so the first thing I could think of to say was, "No thanks".  I meant to say, "No, sorry".  Anyways, the dude gets really pissed and says, "I wasn't offering you the change, I was asking for some!"  Then he proceeded to throw all his change at me.  I was already about 10 feet past him, so nothing hit me, but it must have looked ridiculous -- a homeless guy throwing about $.48 at some college kid.  I felt really bad for that dude that day.  He was just asking for some change and I inadvertently treated him like a dick by saying "thanks" instead of "sorry". 
Sure, that's the worst case but at least there's a good reason to go to a dentist... he'll probably fix your teeth! A holistic doctor is a waste of time, money, and apparently possibly more.
sometimes taking up a whole lane is the only way to keep assholes from shoving you into the ditch. and i think it's stupid to expect a bike to wait at a redlight if the traffic is clear.
Wait until you hear what battery life is like. From what I know about the LTE antenna, it's a huge battery hog. That's why the current 4G aircards are USB: they have to drawn on the laptop or PSU to power the antenna. 
Thank you. I learned long ago that Cuba is too complicated to make too many black and white claims. However, one thing that is clear to me is that Castro has built an authoritarian government that regularly harms its citizens just to maintain power. Because of effective propaganda many people in Cuba don't understand the injustices and cruelty of its government.   Castro "stepping down from power" is an essentially meaningless gesture and Cuba will not see any real improvements until they start holding **real** elections. 
Really?  You don't have any guilty pleasures?  Any junk TV you like, any bad video games you play, any trash space opera/fantasy books you read?  I find it sad that you need to look down on people for enjoying something you find simplistic and crappy - everybody has their foibles.
this is so true. i always give a thanks when someone holds the door for me, but bitches stroll through like you're just the palace guard catering to their every whim or some shit. not a big deal, but it annoys me that they seems so fucking entitled.   cunts.
Mind elaborating?
I couldn't stop laughing at that part because I swear he sounds like a friend of mine.   And me, when I'm pissed. 
Used to have a bong that we called Captain Planet. I mean, logically you could call any bong Captain Planet, but this bong was *motherfucking* Captain Planet.
lagunitas brown sugga. not sure if it was a skunky batch or what, but it was just atrociously bad. 
I am not one of those assholes who cares about reposts, I was just pointing out there should be a thread with a bunch of photoshops and cool comments. Not downvoting or anything :)
I didn't watch, could you give me the cliff notes?
That's really, really creepy... Terrifying.
75%  Furry apologists are usually furries
that's great and all, but I don't support the drug war....... most people here don't. Not that I don't believe you, but can you please provide some proof that "It's still their standard procedure to kill dogs." Where does it say that?
forever TheLoneWanderer101?
33%  Fair share (and 1% on charity)
I don't know what's wrong with me but I have been going on a bit of a mathematics "melvin" binge recently. Just wanted to say that the fact that the number of females approaches infinity as the number of pigs approaches infinity says nothing about the ratio of females to males other than that it is nonzero.
No sir, I am no atheist.  I believe in Satan.
TL;DR Reddit newbies who don't bother reading shit, especially the reddiquette, is what is wrong with reddit.
I have a relative who does this with his daughter and son for breakfasts during the week.  (He has that kind of schedule)  Great idea for your kids to get one on one time.
Well, there are a few things that *might* work for you, at least for a while.  Ask her if she minds giving handjobs and/or BJs. See if she'll do strip shows for you while you take care of things.  You may be able to get some release and some amount of sexual intimacy without full participation from her. Perhaps you can do things that are emotionally intimate, such as shower together, and then afterward use those images in your head to satisfy yourself.  But I suspect you'll eventually get frustrated with not giving her sexual satisfaction, despite knowing that she doesn't want any. You may get frustrated with her 'blah' attitude while trying the above suggestions. She'll get frustrated with only dating one person or you'll become jealous of her emotional intimacy with other partners.  So please remember that there's no such thing as a single soul mate for someone. You're young, and you haven't been together very long. There are other women out there you could fall in love with, and some of those women will share your sexuality instead of having one diametrically opposed to it. Similarly, there are men out there for her who would be happy being with her in the kind of relationship she needs.  Look, it sucks. But sometimes people can be very much in love, and still be incompatible. You can try to make this work, but I think you'll only be prolonging the inevitable.
My friends always ask me why the hell I tip. I usually just say "To Insure Prominent Service. TIPS." Is especially important when you're getting alcoholic drinks. I was on an island and there would be a guy who would walk around taking orders (all inclusive) and after the first drink I gave him a 5. Every time he was remotely in the area he would come and ask how we were, drinks always filled (unlike some others around us, who had to ask the guy to come over, etc.)
I can only really speak for NZ where I am, but killing a Police Dog is a separate charge than killing a cop.  However, the same rules are not applied in reverse, as a Police Dog is a highly trained animal used for law enforcement, and a regular pet is (usually) not.  I will note that I think the actions in that video are over the top anyway though.
The amusing thing is that you just explained the difference between a Ponzi and the Federal Reserve...and you don't even realize it.  You're an idiot.
Yes.
Why do you think he cares about being re-elected?
That's the kinda thing I was asking for. Thanks for the source link.
&gt;the way you made it sound was that they drain the economy,  No, the way I made it sound is that they are dodging income taxes.  I did not write "Drain the economy".  Where do you get this stuff?  &gt;and it is not **red herring**, since they offer you quality service at lower prices, so while they **may not contribute to the national government **  It's a red herring.  You're the equivalent of Glenn Beck saying, "I'm not an alarmist, but we're on the Titanic headed for an Iceberg."
The veteran of many a food fight.
Do you not think it is very much?
I don't know what this is called, but sometimes when I turn my neck, I hit a nerve or something, sending a shockwave of pain up into one side of my brain. I've talked to doctors and they said it wasn't anything to worry about, but wouldn't tell me what it is.
If Zyprexa didn't cause crippling lethargy (in my case), weight-gain and predispose one to diabetes, Symbyax would be a miracle drug.  I loved the psychological effects.  Hated the physical.  Basically fell asleep driving to work one day and got pulled over.  I stopped taking it then.  Next time I took Zyprexa was when I had been admitted.  Taking Symbyax provided the ability to just shut my mind off at will.  Instead of constantly thinking I could just quiet my brain.  Good stuff.
Nope. That would be backwards. It would only be that way if you switched "you're" with "your."   Wait a second ... I see what you did there.
Arbitrator found he violated labor law - the tax payers have to pay the union workers he fired.
You mean like reddit?  You mean like the big advertising box that shows up on the right side of every page?  These are the least obtrusive ad methods I've noticed, and I'd much rather see these than pop-ups, or those stupid scroll over search result things (or worse, those "While your page loads, here's an iframe" things).
Format the computer and do a fdisk /mbr 3 times ? (might be slight overkill)
I read it for the spam!
Certified Athletic Trainer here (medical healthcare provider, not personal trainer)..... You may not be suffering from shin splints. Do you have associated swelling and numbness or tingling into your toes? If so you may be suffering from what's called [exertional compartment syndrome](http://orthopedics.about.com/od/overuseinjuries/a/compartment.htm). The lower leg is broken into 4 compartments, each encased in fascial tissue. During activity the structures within the compartment may swell resulting in exertional compartment syndrome. This is something that will need further evaluation by a physician. This can be a serious thing if left untreated so I would recommend getting to a physician.
Sounds like my friend
mark of mutiny makes their creature stronger, which in a furnace celebration deck makes it much harder to kill. RDW decks have mark of mutiny in as a win condition. This deck seems like it would rarely win on the turn in which it casts act of treason.
I think I've found the feedback I was looking for ಠ_ಠ  I'll check the search function to see what the nuggets of good info were.
When I read "Create fake college", I thought of the South Harmon Institute of Technology.
This kind of mind is allowed and even encouraged to be a parent.  Think about that.
:bow:  well played, sir
No, really just Gingrich, who cheated on his wife while she had cancer.  And if my first comment gets you that bent out of shape, you should probably never, ever watch The Life of Brian.
Waterworld
Get a lawyer.
Don't forget the additional rotational force on the pedals provided by the arm muscles!  It may be less efficient, but it *can* provide a greater power output.
The moongate stops here.  However, if we end up sticking with Skara Brae and trying to take it then zombo will be gating mass amounts of guildmembers to the election stone, no doubt.
waaaay ahead of you.  men without hats is clearly the best for this
[This guy.](http://t1.gstatic.com/images?q=tbn:ANd9GcReBznbAaY3uhIpoMKu3DPlQZI0ShVs6XR8PkIC8sfMo_i_6MM5uA&amp;t=1)
You're completely correct. They watch these shows to get the feeling of experiencing a life they don't have. It's called living vicariously, and it's everything that's wrong with the world.
I will bring mine as well.   http://i.imgur.com/7H87y.jpg
I fundamentally disagree with you, and as such this discussion is going to go nowhere.   For what it's worth, however, this illustrates pretty entertainingly one aspect of why I think you're completely wrong:  http://www.minnpost.com/fix_minnesota_deficit/  Pretty easy to get from point A to point B without going into the "cut spending" categories at all - completely aside from any costs of those big bad terrible unions.
I'm an atheist because I cannot see any reason why a logical person would ever go down that road. I can understand all the arguments that stem from that train of thought, and some of them are brilliant, but at no point in trying to figure out the world around me has the logical answer to any question ever been "Invisible super being." 
After hearing "If I wanted to bag my own shit I'd go to superstore" I'd have a hard time not doing my best valley girl impersonation and say "Bag that FACE, I AM SO SURE!"   I know, I'm really hitting these cultural memes at the height of their popularity.
Just like making abortion illegal reduces abortions in a society. /s  The more people know about religion, the less people are religious.  Comparative religion can be an awesome secular class.
I would agree if the bosses weren't fighting and threatening people the whole time the union is rallying it's supporters. I think that if you have a problem with your union, you should run for a leadership position and fix it. Everyone is entitled by a union to do so. Those that just bitch about things never change what they don't like. You're treating unions like they are some third party that is static and unchangeable. 
I call it the "Styrofoam head" because the casting process they used makes it look like styrofoam.   And it may as well be. 
It hasn't been on reddit at all.  The hive mind has filtered it out.
In super-slow motion, that almost looked like CG footage of some Cthulhoid monstrosity from beyond the stars.  Thanks for the link.  Was interesting.
Sears or some shit?
I don't often say this, but LOL -- literally  Monocoles in both eyes is not near classy enough for you good sir.
[I'm so proud.] (/mantears)
No SIGs? For shame.
http://i294.photobucket.com/albums/mm111/rollo_tomassi7/underboob20xi9fv.gif
You have been to the other side.  The world will never be the same for you.
No I can't stop yelling!  This is how I talk!  Haven't you seen my movies?
That sounds so white, it would make you the whitest kid I know.
In my 10.10 Software Center results, I find MountManager.
[](/troll "You saying that being gay is wrong?")
The mess with us a little bit is great.  I think if humans had that kind of capability we would totally mess with other primitive aliens.
"and that's why you not want to get shot by three fifty seven"
This is a really intriguing video.  Lots going on there, also the bug!!
Definately. Allll the time. I thought it might be the amount of marijuana I am consuming regularly but I think it can more accurately be attributed to my ADHD I was diagnosed with when I was 12.
Blue and orange.
Cute!
Like they say, promises are binding to those who believe in them only.
Thanks for the feedback. I'll have to check Giant Bomb out. I've never visited their site, but I've heard a bit about them. And we DO have a giant hairy overweight staff member (and he does sweat a lot :D)
I was unaware I had so many options. But for now I'm enjoying not caring about religion. It's a nice change of pace. 
Several amazing events.  Well done.
any cactus you can extract hallucinogens from.  Like the peyote :) 
I had this same exact feeling except I enjoyed killing and stabbing them all in their weak spots and their eyes. Sure was satisfying.
More like a medium sized tiger!
Really? She thinks that's a better option than not leaving valuables in her locked car? Jeeze, there's no helping some people.
[They do make Lego like blocks out of rammed earth](http://inhabitat.com/mecopress-machine-makes-lego-building-bricks-from-mud/) but one of the problems with it is the strength to weight ratio. This type of system works better for smaller, mostly residential buildings and is good for thermal mass. 
The day isn't over but I've accomplished everything on that list, except for the speech since that was cancelled. 
As long as it has the "no stain" logo then the formula is completely identical. I have my mission.
thx
Just a local from here in Albuquerque.  Went to school with him, can't believe how far he's come.  Show some reddit love!  edited: Link to download, with his permission of course! http://www.mediafire.com/?6mr5eo733woqipp
I think you spelled Ovechkin wrong.
I don't know how you did it, but after reading the one about the urinal I smell piss. I didn't smell piss before, and there's nothing in here to make it smell like piss. You must be some sort of wizard, and it sucks. I'm going to find a room that doesn't smell like piss :(
I dont know if anyone has heard the commentary to Step Brothers but it is hilarious, they make up songs as they go the entire movie its awesome.
That's fucking true though.  Wake up at 6 a.m. - Mow down hundreds of people on CoD 4 (the only decent console port of the CoD series). Now go to a statistics class at 8:30 a.m. and try to function properly. I swear to god it's fucking purgatory.  Worse than being at the laundromat. It's like a time-stop ass-fucking, it's like the DMV the laundromat and the nursing home waiting area all rolled up into one.   
I'm only suggesting that Trent could have done so much more.  He enters a contest that his name wins, not his talent--which, as I already mentioned, pales in comparison (this once) to Inception.  I take solace in the sound of the hivemind fapping over this, which is genuinely entertaining.
Its not worth the extra heat and power draw. Most games dont use Physx and when they do the performance change is negligible.
It doesn't qualify as a scientific theory. It doesn't even qualify as a scientific hypothesis. A scientific hypothesis must be falsifiable: we must be able to devise a test which could prove it false. Can you give me an example of one test that I could perform that would immediately disprove intelligent design?
Not at all.   If it were my way, the top margainal rate would be 90%.  There is prosperity, and there is wealth, then there is parasitic hoarding of capital for no plausibly legitimate reason.  Taking $39 billion away from a guy with $40 billion to his name will not cause one moment of hardship.
Half the people on r/atheism are just disgruntled at their parents. 
kind of like your-al, but your like yur-al, like the "ur" sound in "fur"
&gt;it's all very uncomfortable for me  Lubricant may help.
Doubtful. Assuming the current rate of globalization, it would not surprise me if we all spoke the same dialect and language in 1000 years.
Sorry for your loss, I apologize if anything I wrote there was offensive to you, and will be deleting what I wrote just in case. 
Can something really be fictional fiction?
I really like this one. 
That picture looks like a drawing of what it's like on a moon orbiting an exoplanet.
[Check out Fastweb.it](http://www.fastweb.it/offerte/?WT.mc_id=fastwebmenu1)  they have wired most cities with fiber optic cable. They have different plans including voice and TV.
People create their own misery a lot of the time.
how does your droid have anything less than 2.0? Anyhoot, I suggest barncle.  The wep encryption doesn't work on droid 1, but at least you can nat filter.
JOTO GUSTA
Kind of.  Sure, it's a little weak on the details, but I enjoyed it and I'm almost 30.  I'd say it's worth a watch if you're a fan of the Fallout series of games, post-apocalyptic themes, or indirectly-but-pretty-blatantly-atheistic themes.  Besides, I don't think kids are going to pick up on the underlying theme about religion and free-thinking that it tries to send.  edit:  I found out about the movie [here](http://atheistmovies.blogspot.com/), which may give you some kind of idea as to who might enjoy it.  It's definitely more than a kids movie, enough to the point where I'm comfortable recommending it.
Perhaps I would, but I highly doubt restaurants would be hurting a lot more to pay their waiting staff properly. Almost everybody I know can't seem to sit down and eat for less than $30-50 a person. I'm fairly certain the overhead isn't huge on food production. Paying your employees another few dollars an hour is perfectly reasonable without requiring a massive boost in food costs. This goes for most places as well, the customers aren't exactly seeing the savings here.  It's just an awkward social demand, they used to pay "tip" jobs full wages and there were no problems but once they realized the salaries were outrageous because tipping paid so incredibly well they reduced mandatory payment by employers which they happily seized. There's a reason everyone tells you to get a job that involves tips, it still pays much better than other alternatives. Tipping used to be for good service, not a mandatory fee determined by you based off of the quality of service you have received.
I look around both shoulders after the page comes up and yell, "IT COULD HAVE HAPPENED TO ANYBODY!" while doing a fucking 360 in my office chair.
what a waste
Yes, I am very impressed, too. Thanks for sharing your process, OP!
My feces has more protein in it than a Twinkie but that doesn't mean I should sell it at 7/11.
I'm sure they have five agents on top of it.  &gt;You being here illegally is not following laws and not being honest at all.  No judge has decreed that a law was broken, so therefore - by the laws of this country you so proudly claim fealty too - he is innocent of any crime.   UNTIL such time that a judge rules a law was broken he is here legally because we are ALL innocent until proven guilty.   Even a person who admits to breaking a law has **not** done so until a judge or jury says it as well.   You should relearn what they taught in civics.  &gt;No, this is not your home.  Yes, it is his home.  You cannot take that away.  &gt;You don't belong here and you certainty are not wanted if you can not follow the same laws as everyone else.  Not wanted by who?  I want him here - pays taxes and doesn't collect benefits...if only we could get southerners to do the same our country would be on the right track.  &gt;What makes you think you are above the law?  He never claimed he was above the law...not sure what you are saying here.
http://www.prettyyourworld.com/deep-winter-seasons.html  Most informative site I could find quickly :P  Edit: site not sight. 
and to think I get excited anytime I download anything faster than 1 mB/s...
Where is the video for this?
I agree in general. Tax cuts by themselves, though, if they're accompanied by the respective spending cuts, are not an inherently bad idea though. 
I COMPLETELY AGREE. I WOULD HAVE NO PROBLEM PAYING TAXES IF I FELT IT WHERE BEING RETURNED THROUGH GOOD SOCIAL CONSTRUCTS AND PROGRAMS, BUT LIKE YOU POINTED OUT, NOT EVERYONE IS CONTRIBUTING EQUALLY AND THEREFORE IT DESTROYS THE FEASIBILITY OF TAXATION AS A MEANS TO FUND THESE PROGRAMS. B.O.A. SHOULD NOT BE PAYING LESS TAXES THAN ME. 
&gt;9/11 denier  Wait, what?  He denies that 9/11 happened?
It is said that KERS will play a greater role in the future, if that makes you happy (it does for me).
shit wish i saw that before i posted this 
I've never understood the distinction between rape and date rape.  Is it better to be raped by someone you went out with as opposed to a stranger?  
Can you whistle?  Can you hum?  Then you're in business. Hum, but with your mouth open. Now, slowly breathe out a bit while you're humming. Next, make that slow breathing out into a whistle.  Easy.
Well ya know, I guess most people don't understand how to get massive amounts of exposure. It's the attitude of..  "We hate major networks...we will never show our faces on those networks spreading our message!..and anyone who does is bullshit!"..
does in newer versions.   it doesn't ask the questions up front though, so you still have to wait for it to finish after you come back and answer the prompts. 
I can't be the only one who had to go back to see there was a mouse with giant testicles right?
Got into a car accident driving home from work. Thankfully, there were no injuries and only minor damage. 
My brother and I ran into a friend of his from our small Mississippi town when at the Barbican in London in about 1995. 
and with the age of members like Till reaching up towards 50 they likely wont be coming back. :( got my tickets for Edmonton :D
I would also like to point out that anabolic steroids do nothing other than allow you to train more by recovering faster. If you take anabolics and sit on your ass all day eating potato chips, you will find little if any difference than if you didn't take them. 
*Milk and eggs, bitch.*
Me too!
Just to weigh in on Aleks - I got to test drive it a few years ago - it's very cool.
It can happen, I have seen caves where the roof is made of sand. I've never seen it where it was directly under water, usually see it just on the shore line.  This looks like a pretty big cavern, nice find!
Well, I'll put it this way. I'm getting paid to obtain my masters from a state funded school. I got a full ride and a fellowship that gives me about 30K to live on...and I wouldn't even say that what I'm majoring in is as practical as a doctorate would be.
Tried Spore on Chrome. Very impressive performance. I didn't spend more than a few minutes, but it didn't feel any worse than playing the actual game.
It seems like we wouldn't be very subject to natural selection anymore, even if we did slow down our pace. Doesn't it require a high population pressure (which we've rightly been working very hard to avoid)?
They aren't making 6502 here you idiot.  I mean do you really think that Intel doesn't have the money to license these patents and/or the patent portfolio themselves to make a trade for them?  You also overlook exactly how slot PND actually is.
I'm a left-handed INTP.
I literally just turned in a paper on the HB Gary hack...not even an hour ago.  Now its outdated! RAGE! :)
It was a cool style back in the.... wait, it was never cool. 
It's definitely not Korean.  I think it's Taiwanese, which makes it Chinese in language.
You noticed, huh?  I do, yeah. None taken.
I dunno, I've seen guys doing 11k DPS told they were "carried" because the other DPS in the instance were doing 12k.  I think its a crock of shit. If you can beat the instance, then you're not being carried.
I come from seemingly liberal parents, one of which (my father) watches Fox News.  He's read all of Bill O'Reilly's books, he's suggested I read them, and from what my mom hints at, they occasionally watch Glenn Beck as well. (It's funny that my mom has to "admit" that, like they have a secret sexual fetish or something).  I'm all for free speech, and I'm very open minded to REALLY listening to someone when they state their opinion in a clear and intelligent manner, but Glenn Beck is fucking poison.  That man is a swindling, poisonous liar who profits off of lying to people on a fucking regular basis.  I know we can't all have the same opinion, that'd be boring, but it actually pains me to know that my down to earth parents watch that shit.
They also referenced the [BNL scene](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=AfdTnpV03p8).
Thank you so much!
* Rush with Direct Hit Soldiers. * Kritz Rush with RL Soldiers. * Two good snipers. * One good sniper and a competent team. * One or two ubered demomen.
[Bustabrain 1](http://www.ninjadoodle.com/bustabrain/)
At first I was like "WTF nothing is blocked out, I see stars in there".  Then I realized how much dust is on my monitor...and now a big patch of fingerprints too.  Dammit!
7% of the private sector is unionized. Down from ~32% at its peak in the very early 1950s. Unionized people in the private sector break down like this: professional athletes, actors, and people who's job can be replaced by a robot.   Why does reddit hold so much passion for something that's largely irrelevant in the modern economy? 
A friend with this loves to use his for body shots at parties
First of all, I thought we were talking about how whether it was possible that aliens gave ancient people fire and other early inventions. You can see how I thought that was not only unsupported by the archaeological record but also patronizing to the ability of human beings.   Now, on to your ghastly opinion of archaeology:  &gt; Archaeology is the science of combining empirical study of artifacts with modern-culture-lensed perspectives of what x tribe might have done with y, or how some guy with a degree who only necessarily understood 60% of the fraction-of-the-field material he learned thinks they probably arrived at z. Further, belief that aliens are the inspiration for certain deities is itself based on archaeological evidence. Both perspectives are modern-bias inferences based on an enormously incomplete data set.  Archaeology is the study of past human life-ways through material culture. You have managed to take the concept of postprocessual archaeology and used it to condemn archaeology from the get-go. Yes, we are invariably affected by culture and this will inform how we study the past, but in knowing this we can be more critical of ourselves and our culture. If you are implying that trying to put the past in dialogue with the present is pointless for this reason, then I think you are more cynical than is appropriate.   To my knowledge, there is no evidence in the archaeological record that aliens are the inspiration for certain deities. 
Evolution and natural selection aren't the same thing.
not that long ago, our children would fight wars, getting married in your teens was expected, fast forward a couple hundred years and our kids are too fragile to hear a curse word, they dont even know what it means unless someone tells them.  was there some sort of massive plague that made our kids so fragile?
Thanks! Long time lurker prior to registration - so it's not real!
Sweet dog...shitty dogma!
"Also put it in a starburst."
Best thing about twenty three year olds?  TWENTY OF THEM.
Sport fishing, it's better than we'll ever let on!
This is disgusting.
I am not sure if I understand your argument. If you have a child because you want to have joys of being a parent, or if you want to have someone to take care of you in your old age, is that *exploitive*? &gt; we are the ones making it hard on them Even without interference from people many animals have very difficult lives. If you look at the reproductive rates of rodents, for instance, you can see that the fast majority of them must die (in I imagine rather unpleasant ways) at rather young ages. 
I dunno man...you still gotta get up for it.
What if you are?
Well, your opponent will, after he knocks you out.
Tell the average internet users you know how important it is to them.  Ask if they want to be forced to pay extra to get facebook, youtube, porn, etc online.  Right now, the telcos and republicans are playing a dirty propaganda game, and we need regular people to push back.
I never said anything to the contrary. 
&gt; apparently they haven't made a 6 year club yet.  I think that's because reddit itself isn't six years old yet. :-P
70% 
Thanks for the lengthy reply, I was really hoping to get a Christian perspective of this topic (lots of atheists in r/Christianity...). I agree that intention is incredibly important. I think my real intention is to understand how she can rationalize her belief with an aspect of reality that I could not get past.   The more I thought about how 'blessings' seemed to be heaped upon white, middle-class people in North America, but given out so stingily to brown, poor people in Africa, the less I could believe in a caring and powerful God. It became impossible for me to see "blessings" and "answered prayers" as anything more than coincidence and the luck of being born white in North America. The only way for me to reconcile this reality was to stop believing that any sort of powerful, merciful God existed, and now I am quite comfortable with my atheism.   In the end, I suppose I would just like to know if my friend has seriously pondered these realities, and how she can maintain her belief in God (not because I would like to return to believing in God, simply to understand her thought process).   Additionally, the less purely intentioned part of me can't help but see her comment as incredibly and infuriatingly arrogant! To me, she must believe that God is capable and willing to grant her a good quality sleep but wouldn't give freedom to a child sold into sexual slavery (or even a good sleep to that child instead of being assaulted numerous times throughout the night). What could possibly make her so worthy of answered prayers and that child so unworthy? Because I know her, I know she couldn't possibly think that she is more worthy, so I suppose I want to know why she thinks she is given 'blessings' while others are not. In a thoroughly poorly intentioned way, I want her to either defend her arrogance or acknowledge that it is arrogant (which may be ‘talking her out of her faith’ but I don’t think it *must be*).   I suppose I could ask you: Are you able to reconcile the existence of a powerful and merciful God and the existence of incredible suffering simply with the notion that “God has a point of view that we cannot understand” or is there more to it than that? Doesn’t it seem incredibly unfair that one woman’s faith is tested with by a lack of sleep, but a child’s faith is tested by a life filled with dozens of sexual assaults each and every day? How could a merciful God be okay with such inequality when he has the power to stop it? And if God does not have the power to stop such terrible things, does he really have the power to give Ashley a good night’s sleep? 
Look the point is, I am not preventing anyone from doing anything with my actions. You are. Simple as that.
Obama is not a dictator and this country is not a command economy.
For some reason I read the title as Reddit, what nude act...
shared toilet seats. 
Yes.  The true choice is between short term pleasure vs. long term gain. Eat cake now vs. be skinny later. Play modern warfare now vs. graduate college.  
Dude, no. That's every night that *I* go to bed! Lol
Downvote for circlejerking
Great work!
So, it was sarcasm then.  There's no rule against experts editing articles in their area of expertise.  Thanks.
I went to college and I downvoted.  First off, your results are fucked.  Secondly, please read the the reddiquette.
Fuck yea
How can he even pretend anymore that he has the best interest of the people of Wisconsin in mind?  
first off,i was trying to promote inflection!   second,"Larry the cable guy" is an act..............fuck you i won't make it easy by posting a link! google it fucktwat!  THIRD!:well fuck.... it's kinda hard to argue with you on that one..............i agree!  last but not least,do you fucking realize how many redneck's were exposed to factual information!!!!!!!!!!!!!seriously!!!!! that shit is an hour long.....the avg neck can drink 6-8 busch light's per hour.....it may be enough for them to forget to change the channel &amp; accidentally watch something educational!
I LLLOOVVEEE This. Wow, you've got an amazing talent. I'm glad I clicked on this link.
They try harder as well.
Dude, he didn't read past the headline on reddit before he posted this, what makes you think he's going to read your two sentence quote?  I mean it's got commas and shit for Christ's sake.
your plurality of words defeats me.   you win.
Not when it comes to playing Pokemon.
WHAT AIN'T NO COUNTRY I EVER HEARD OF
I want to be skinned, then dressed in a suit made of my skin.
No but them gays is gonna get rights and force ya to marry an animal and become a Commie. Protect your kids, read em the Bible.
Cool thanks, this clarifies it a lot. I'm definitely just looking to get in shape right now now, so I think SKD will be just fine for me!
Regarding glossolalia, sure, i should have said "another label." Slip of the mind.  As for brainwave silliness, most of that has fallen away over the years. Hypnosis was originally thought to be animal magnetism. Tons of hypotheses later, we find that we can still tell people to do things or feel things and they do. It's the best common word for using the power of suggestion.  Anybody who claims that hypnosis can cure disease is a fraudster, obviously. Hypnosis can part people from their money but it can't do anything that isn't also done by any other form of suggestion fraud.
This essentially summed up my psychology class during senior year of high school.  I'd fall asleep in 3rd period and wake up next to some of my friends in 4th.  Then I'd go back to my psych teacher's room during lunch and nap on the floor, using a sweater as a pillow.  ...I wasn't getting enough sleep back then.
Well, my goal is to actually meet and interact with people, not just travel in my little bubble.
Your left hand needs to slide so it's angled more "forward."  Try and get it so your thumb is pointed straight forward.  It looks like your left middle finger may not be making firm contact with your right hand.  Is there a gap there or are you pulling it tight?
Well, you actually make cakes (including eggs and milk) on a workbench. So that might work for cookies too. But the furnace seems more appropriate.
before 2.5 men he was in Spin City and pretty funny in that too, he was also very good in Hot shots part 1 and 2 which were just awesome, I loved him in Platoon I just saw it this sunday again on cable, great film, there's also a lot of other films which were very good.  I think he's just a sick guy and needs help, his latest rants stopped being funny to me and remind me of those crazy homeless guys no one gives a shit about, he reminds me of my meth addicted cousins and how they speak but make no sense, it just crossed the point of being funny and is just now quite sad.
Magmus 
French assassin kitteh is not amused  
I went to a small progressive private school.  My mother was my 4th grade teacher.  4th grade was the first year of sex-ed.  First day of sex-ed she turned out the lights and put in the Nova video on human sexuality in which — amoung many other things — there is footage from inside a vagina during intercourse that ends with a *very* close up shot of the penis ejaculating.  Then she turned the lights on and asked if we had any questions.  It took a while to socially rebound from that one.
I actually live off campus, but I will still miss the connection... although I am allowed in the library as an alumni...
Puts my 7 km before work into a less impressive place.
What again!
I have had a couple bouts of ITBS. Just stop running for a few days and then ease back into it. You do not want a full bout of ITBS as you will be sidelined for a long time.
Creativity?!?! BURN HIM!
Sure, it's quite common.  Slow onset, long acting.  Mellows you out for about 8-12 hours.  Takes about 30-60 minutes to kick in.
You're right, He's a rat.
Upvoted for understanding the difference between media and journalism. 
"Come at me, Lion. Let me show you the fuck out of Gabon. Ahhh! Run! Leopard!"
Anime and mature do not belong in the same sentence.
Orient, not orientate, sir.  Also, how does one orient the notch if one can't see where said notch is pointing?
Didn't get to wake up as early as I wanted 'cause I was up last night doing hw due today.   I had 2 scrambled eggs for breakfast/lunch. Then went to Costco and bought spring mixed greens and rotisserie chicken for dinner tonight. I ended up buying their "nonfat yogurt" swirl on my way out though. Oops.   Planning to do P90x day 1 on lean (core synergistics) in an hour or so. Hopefully I won't get lazy and just watch tv instead. 
Yeah, right. So I suppose that if alcohol was prohibited there'd be a whole bunch of criminals running around with guns, having turf wars and generally causing mayhem over where they could sell alcohol would there? Honestly, the ideas that some people come out with.
That other guy looks crazy.
cute :)
Right,  Yea I hear it should stay under 37% gross, but I am trying to do some scenarios and want to know how claiming 6 vs 0 will affect my paycheck. Essentially I am withholding an interest free loan from the gov by doing this.
Ohhh man I have a few...  (Talking about some type of food my dad wanted me to try) "Just take the whole thing, put it in your mouth"  (My girlfriend with a squirt bottle) "It feels good when it squirts into my mouth!"  My dad was mixing concrete one day, and told me "the more you rub it the longer it stays wet"
Hello, only cat in the world I actually like.
The tree browser isn't the best for copying/moving files if you can't fit both destinations in the same vertical.  For that, its better to have two windows open, one at each location so you don't have to scroll mid-drag. In windows I will drag something down to the window list to maximise the new window and drop it in.  But we all know how we hate extra internet browser windows and so have adopted tabbed browsing...  Nautilus ftw.
I think it's time you (and most people who responded to you) invested in some glasses. Your eyesight could use a little help, I think.
It's cool. I'll try and get on later tonight (it's 7pm where I am). ttyl! And thanks for making me an admin/op/whatever you call it. X-P
I understand staring at someone because you've never seen someone like that before. I get looks from time to time too, usually from children though, but this was different. Several people just stood there watching this group of people shop. Just a few feet away from them. Asian thing or not, that's disrespectful. And I don't think this was an "Asian" thing, because as I said, I get looks from time to time too, but never like this. It's like they were watching animals at the zoo or something.
Same ISP  http://www.speedtest.net/result/1178587664.png  Gutted mate!
Alright then.  I have some unpopular opinions as well.  I don't like the Godfather movies... too slow.  Have an upvote!
Hugh Laurie, or Benedict Cumberbatch
&gt; Dieing is for fools.  Oh, you must of snorted up the answer obviously.   &gt; You should've read the directions before you showed up to the party.  That actually is something to take in and consider the next time he offers to pay people to have sex with him. 
&gt;despite overwhelming evidence that gay couples are just as good as hetero couples.  I can vouch for that, in case anyone calls you on it :-)
HOLY SHIT! I had never heard of this show (apparently it doesn't show in the cave I live in). It is incredibly funny. Granted, I only watched the first episode.  Thanks for the post complaining that it wasn't funny. Had I not seen this, I would never have seen how funny it is.
I had a similar experience with rotten yogurt.  Instant karma has a special way of making you feel like a complete dipshit.  Lesson learned.  
Agreed.  She could be grossly fat.
Oh my god I forgot about that one. Terrible. And all of my friends wanted to drink it when we were in Vancouver. I really didn't understand it. 
*Captain Cannabis* 
Yeah, you should have won as we were truly awful.   Although that said, your goal was offside.
Its Christmas already?? I thought it was February.  
In other news, Gadhafi is asking the world to hold US Leaders accountable for gross atrocities, violating the UN Universal Declaration of Human Rights and called on America's elected officials to step down...
Notify me when they hack the Kochs computers and deliver the emails to Wikileaks. Then I might give them a bit of my time.
Everyone should hollow out a mountain... I guarantee you the satisfaction will be worth it.
I don't know how people could ever still believe that the female orgasm is a myth. It reminds me of the 17th century incorrect thought that if a woman gets pregnant, it couldn't have been rape, since she needed to orgasm to have the child.   How can an idea like this exist in a society half-filled with women?
Wait, wait, what if you attend college but skip a lot?  What do you vote then?
Terran needs to stop being lazy. It's hard to balance a game when one race only uses like 1/3rd of their units -_-
this is incredibly fucking wierd, op, because i was on a ferry on my way to manhattan also when the same thing happened. i sat down right next to her and so i was kinda forced to say something. i got lucky. i was on vacation in the east coast for the summer and i had just arrived from the LAX airport in california. so the thing i said was "hey i just arrived from so cal my watch is still behind a couple of hours, would you mind telling me the real time haha?" we hit it off fine and i got her number.  this is probably against all PUA pro's but this has worked for me in the past with somewhat successful results. look busy, look alpha, then without any hesitation either mildly walk up to her/sit down next to her/etc. ask a question then start a conversation about why you asked that question like what i did. im not saying all your intro strats should be like this, simply base your strategy off mine, its flawed but its worked well for a 4 year battled hardened WoW veteran.   any redditors with a bigger brain than i do feel free to helpfully criticize my game be harsh
Well they did have bibles... cause we all know that's all you need. /sarcasm
Clean diesel on the 2009 TDI+ MY make less soot than the avg gasser. The emissions system is more complex than the engine.
I thought I was taught in economics that the two ways to stimulate an economy were to either cut taxes or to spend out the ying yang.  Both of which create a short term deficit. One group chooses one solution, another chooses another solution.   
Can be useful if you get neuted, and they are not too long to train to 3.
I attended college but I downvoted because of the blatant karma whoring.
Yes. [Really](http://nopattern.tumblr.com/post/2585567591/more-lighter-photos-straight-off-the-camera).
[] (/forever) 
Reading. It's good.
Do check the previously posted threads about moving to the TCs, but in general, I'd recommend these neighborhoods if you prefer to live close to the U of M: Como, Dinkytown, Prospect Park, St. Anthony (in St. Paul), and Northeast. Uptown *is* a great neighborhood, but it's expensive and congested. The Cities (as we here tend to refer to the aggregate area, including the suburbs) is a lot like most other big cities I've been to. Traffic can be a bitch at times, especially if it's snowing. However, we have an excellent system of trails (so if you like to bike and walk, you will be happy here) and a decent bus system. We currently have one light rail route which goes between Bloomington to downtown Minneapolis, but it's in the middle of a sizeable expansion which will carry it between the two downtowns of Mpls. and St. Paul in a couple of years.   I've lived here for over 40 years and know both Minneapolis and St. Paul very well, so feel free to message me anytime and I'll be happy to answer your questions. 
Thanks a bunch for that rundown :)  And yup, seems reddit double posted lol.  [Here is the one I'm looking at](http://www.modster-pc.co.nz/shop/product_info.php?products_id=3908), turns out it's Rev1/a. Any idea what the difference between them is?
Try covering one eye at a time and seeing how his expression goes from "cool mother fucker" to "oh shit!"
Warwick's suppression is 1.7 seconds.
Yes. Exactly.
EDIT: No, I didn't name them, but I still remember with fond longing a white an blue Bianchi that got snatched in under ten minutes.
Are u stupid? FAT= DIABETES. Go troll some where else 
I haven't been able to use my bong for this yet due to the sun being blocked by the hill behind my house, but solar hits are definitely my favorite way to toke.
milk thistle, milk thistle, don't say no more, you're here every morning, standing by my door
I just learned -- through a first aid course at St John's ambulance -- that 911 works in the UK, too.  Apparently there were too many people learning 911 from US TV shows, so they made it ring through to 999 as well.  Cool, huh?
Now is the 10's.
tons of college kids live in/around Cambridge, you'll be fine if you keep your eyes and ears open
**My closest game**: http://pastehtml.com/view/1dfsgl7.html  It's my Rain Dance team, but I was still new at the game and pulled it off rather poorly. I managed to win only because of a few lucky crits.  **Two Rain Dance teams**: http://pastehtml.com/view/1dfsjp5.html  Crobat taunts me, so I can't set up Rain Dance. Then he sets up Rain Dance, and I realize *we're both running Rain Dance*. I freak out and make a few key mispredicts (and also gamble on no crit one too many times), and lose.  **Six Dodrios against six Pidgeots**: http://pastehtml.com/view/1dfsnyh.html  lovelove and I got into an argument about whether Dodrio or Pidgeot was better. So we fought six Dodrios against six Pidgeots. I lost the first game, but this is the second game in which I get the Flail set working a bit better.
This is a good suggestions. I tried this with him in person once, and he's was rather uncoordinated. But I'm sure it would just take some practice.
They're mixing [US and UK wedding anniversary gift materials](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Wedding_anniversary#Traditional_and_modern_anniversary_gifts). 1 (paper), 2 (cotton), 3 (leather) are from the US, 4 (flower) is from the UK, and 5 (wood/wooden) works for either. If they go with the US for 6, it'll be iron. If they go with the UK, it'll be sugar. I'm betting they'll make an iron version, because iron is badass.
I agree, but With the pieces they have they have some options to use in the future. The kids they have now will get a bit bigger by next year, I think Eberle and Hall seem a bit more durable as compared to Hemsky or Gagne.
i follow some pretty obscure rules. you've probably never heard of them.
Same thing happened here.  Not only did I lose every email from high-school/university, but I also lost a bunch of contacts that were impossible to find again (friends from other countries for example).  Still burns me to this day to think about how many friends I lost touch with from that era due to logging in a week too late :(
All they need to do is write Coca-Cola and use their giant mountain of cash to take care of this problem.
Wat
it actually stands for paste in front and ctrl + b paste behind, but ya these 2 are the coolest shit even and I hate not having them in photoshop
Taken from the first comment.   ""It is now clear that two foundations of anti-Keynesianism—rational expectations and the efficient-markets hypothesis, both of which are embraced by mainstream economics despite the absence of empirical support—are simply wrong."  Proof that Mr. Kirshner is not an economist. "  &gt;Business schools should make it mandatory for business students to take at least one class of psychology.  No thanks  &gt;The whole system is flawed and behavioral economics needs to be more widely taught.  I did a lot of experimental economics, and I can tell you that rational thought certainly does exist.  Interesting article, but a lot of nonsense
***BOOM!***
I moved to USA from Ukraine when I was 9. Two years ago I went back to visit and it was totally strange and new to me. Young teenagers (14 or so) would freely smoke outside.  Alcoholic beverages would be sold to teenagers without question.  For some reason everyone that was my age seemed 3 years older to me.   EDIT: I forgot to mention that in a public bathroom I encountered on a rest stop had completely functioning faucets and stalls but no toilets, just holes in the ground... 
Limited slip is a locking axle. It slips a limited amount, then it locks...
Why wouldn't you link to the [video](http://www.nsca.com/videos/displayvideos.asp) section of the site? edit:  holy crap that site loads videos slowly.  
Now it feels like Reddit again.
Kin I get this on a USB Memory Drive?
It works, "The backhanded compliment to low her selfesteam - a proven winner." [True story](http://images.wikia.com/paradisa/images/2/2c/Barney.jpg).
Giggity giggity ;)
But that's because they were hot twins... *twins!*  If we don't get a free pass for that, what do we get one for?
Best video I've watched in ages. This needs more upvotes... or I need to get out more.
&gt;standing up feels like more fun  No, it's much more fun to sit and spin while you fly past the mashers who are standing!
My housemate calls them her "parasite vaccine".
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=QsogswrH6ck
&gt;Reddit, support this game.  I smell viral.
Yeah, we didn't even think about when we were supposed to take it away.  I guess in hind sight maybe we should have kept it around longer.  But she's 17 months old now and seems normal so far.  That'll change though once she's old enough to play Minecraft with me.
If you have the exact model number you can always get a service manual for it from the HP website. They're pretty detailed.  But if it and you are happy with Linux, carry on!
I cant do it to save my life, best so far is 6.7meters...
don't grad students live in the grad college their first year?   you'll be pretty well-off with pretty much any provider, so i wouldn't worry too much about reception. at&amp;t and verizon both have towers near or on campus, and a few friends of mine have been perfectly well-off using sprint and t-mobile.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2pfwY2TNehw This will answer all your questions
Redditors just like to bitch about everything.
Well, that's just lazy. I've carefully explained my rationale; you have not. You can make the weak excuse that I'm "irrational" but we both know that's not true. I've laid my logic at every step; you've thrown in half-assed quips without any moral backing. I mean, c'mon man: at least nut up and throw some Ayn Rand at me.
&gt;It is a miracle I didn't do any damage with all of my efforts to restart the engine with no fuel.   It is impossible to damage any part of an engine by turning it over without fuel. The worst you could have done was kill your battery...which you'll do long before you burn out your starter.
Precisely.  My dad has always had a bit of a mentality that we somehow owed him something for being here.  He'd always go into his whole spiel about how he brought us here, we owed him respect because he was our father, and we didn't have any rights we didn't earn through obedience.  Thank God my mom got that being a parent means your kids always come first.  You can imagine who our favorite parent was growing up.  I hated him until my early twenties.  It took me many years as an adult to learn to love him, albeit as a deeply flawed human being.
On the PC, a patch came out several weeks ago that partially nerfed the abilities of shotgun slugs. The crosshairs haven't been that close since the patch, is why I noticed. Are you playing on another platform?
For anyone wondering, those paintball pistols are [Tippmann TPX's](http://www.google.ca/images?q=tippmann+tpx&amp;um=1&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;source=og&amp;sa=N&amp;hl=en&amp;tab=wi&amp;biw=1920&amp;bih=1085), painted of course.
Ok, pics.  sorry my cell phone takes lame pictures: http://imgur.com/a/rZEzk#q0zh6
&gt;Everything against the Yankees,  FTFY
PS, congrats on the Half! You get the time that you wanted?
Oh, maybe this is what I'm doing.  I go out and I try but I am hardly interested in a one night stand.  Trying to find something a bit more than that is more complicated I guess.  I think I'm a nice person, I'm certainly not the most attractive or the skinniest but I laugh a lot, I make lots of sarcastic jokes and I smile a lot...when I feel comfortable with the people I am around.  
Mmm hmm.  Cute.
So, the Scala compiler does not automatically optimize tail recursive functions? I would rather this be automatic rather than having to specify an annotation for it to occur. This is how F# is done...
I had to read this immediately after completing HL2. There was so much in the story that I just didn't pick up on.
Like I said, I don't do any park stuff. Mostly groomers, powder if I can get it. No rails, half pipes, barely any jumps. 
That's very interesting. To be honest I live in NJ, I just spend a lot of time on Staten Island (my studio is there). I'm still somewhat skeptical though, the tap water really does taste funny, though I guess if that's true it's likely the pipes in that building.
Combined with fear of the unknown.
A friend of mine went to Japan for a couple of years to teach English. It was a good time in his life. I think it's better if you don't have a girlfriend, though. China may be different in that respect.  One thing about this time in your life - you may think you shouldn't do something because you have "better things to do", but really you don't. I mean really, what are you going to do if you don't go to China?
There's a lot of different things that are pretty great in the US, but it certainly can't be argued how varied and beautiful the countryside is.  Thanks for the comment.
&gt; Try not to take it personal, it really shows what the kids are being told at home and church about the world.  Exactly this.  If a man cares about people, is educated, intelligent, gentle, intellectual... he's obviously a faggot.   Homophobia and gender roles hurt a lot more than just gay men.
Third (and i am the first person in this reply conversation so its mostly like a second yet..) :)
I might be missing the point- the game runs on the computer so this is less about being able to play Crysis on a netbook and more about being able to play PC games on any platform?
I wouldn't cut all contact as she was being entirely honest when she didn't have to be. I'm sure she is remorseful and regrets what she did however, I wouldn't stay with her. At least not in a LDR scenario.
Pick somebody out at random. Follow them around.
Even Dr. Pepper gives his sources :D  I have to go to bed, I'll answer in the morning.
Smoke packs and Hamburger Stacks. I eat burgers and I have smoked tobacco, but I can't wrap my head around people who feel like the world owes them a hermetically sealed, golden egg in five minutes or less. I actually do personal garbage clean-ups that are never publicized. I am a tree planter and I can clean about 3 shopping carts full in about an hour. I visit private residences in my cleanups too! I wish you didn't have to endure that :)
It was nearing the end of the school semester and I was a junior in High School. It was a hot day, as most are near the end of school, and my teacher decided that it would be nice to go outside and do our assigned reading. The pool at my High School was centered in the quad, and was secured by a low fence. I played waterpolo my whole High School career and was accustomed to hopping over the fence into the pool. But, now there was a challenge and an audience, my whole english class. I managed to slip over the railing and into the pool, and then quickly back over again without my teacher noticing. My teacher wouldn't have notice for I was wearing darker clothing that didn't easily show the water, but when I got up the cement where I sat was soaked. In my sophomore algebra class there was a dispute between the two fattest people in our class between whom could run the bases quicker. To make it better one was a boy and the other a girl, and they were both highly competitive. My teacher got sick of their bickering and took the whole class out the baseball diamond, and started them off in the opposite direction around the bases. The whole class watched the fat bodies past the bases at almost the same speed. When they came down to the homestretch they didn't give a fuck, they pushed it, pushed it so hard that they collided and the girl totally took out the boy. I think that was the end of class because we couldn't get it back together after that. GAWD I still seem them and remind them of this. Funny thing is that they both lost their weight after this. 
So she gets to be a cunt?  Looks like you both drank the kool aide.
The airforce is the educated branch of the military.  Atheist or theist, their views are less likely to stem from ignorance.  A tour in the army is one big stream of dick and fart jokes.
I have a sinking feeling he's going to be 9600.
Those investments are finally going to make him a billionaire.
0%   It's a damn good question nobody has ever adequately answered.  And they seem to be downvoting you in a flurry of butthurt
that was good. this is how i imagine most cap fights to go, and note the counter @ about :23. there are some seriously good ideas that can be learned from cap but it's exhausting and disorienting most of the time. http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=R8FJyScbV6s&amp;feature=related
16$ sounds fine. 
I would like to point out that citing reliable sources when making an argument can prevent this.  If it is an argument that cannot have support cited, you may with to reconsider your viewpoint (no need to change it)
[7} TITTAYS
Have a good time. Remember, thought, that the police don't enforce indecent exposure laws for women, but they do for men- I saw a guy dragged off a balcony for being in jockey shorts.
This is very common in everyone! In some people it's more pronounced, however. Some typical triggers are things like excess caffeine or vigorous exercise. Also, if you are fighting to remain awake, or are sleep deprived, these hypnagogic jerks can be more pronounced.
What does this have to do with Android?
My wife and I have ours for May 13th in Edmonton :D
Wrong.  Please don't ever drive with that attitude.
&gt; Confused by your question.  That's because I'm stupid and misread the thread topic :)  Ignore me.
What about for water pockets in shoes? My hiking boots got a hole in it somewhere and now they slowly let in water, and they now squeak and soak.
Yeah, she's fat but I feel just as bad for America that someone like you would eagerly post her picture on the net for a laugh.  Grow up.  
17... perfect age.
Umm, no.  First, there are many ugly babies. Probably half the babies I've seen were ugly, so pro-rata half the worlds babies are ugly.  Second, great song.  Third, these kids are actually cute.  Fourth, that dude has an awesome kitchen table and I wish I had it.
Though in the end, the macbook was *diminished* - Hold the door for me...
"BIIIP you! You can't do what I do"
Holy. Shit.
Author of the original.  You did it perfectly.  [](/fy1)
Well to be fair, most Americans wanted to go on Space Mountain first.
Hopefully it wasn't the DX or whatever that big mofo kindle is
this picture was taken with my iPhone 4
In order for the addon, "Of Things Not Lost," to be given to the masses, between today (Feb. 28), and March 4, 1,000,000 people need to share the Dragon Age link of the day on Facebook.   Make your fellow gamers happy and share the link ^.^
He's saying quite clearly that if someone killed his dog he would murder him.  that's a pretty clear choice right there.
I hope that this will never became a rule. This is what separates the true gentleman from the others that want to win at all cost.
&gt;Is there anything I would gain from continuing to brew from extract? Time. An extract batch begins at roughly the midway point of an AG batch.  An AG batch takes 1.5-2 hrs longer.  When you're in a time pinch, you may want to brew an extract batch rather than nothing at all.
Mobs are any of the non player characters.  Peaceful mobs included such as cows, chickens, pigs. 
That game was awesome! First thing that came to my mind as well.
Definitely a cultural issue...here in the States, we applaud when athletes beat on [small animals](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iloN1RPs4n0).
Yes.
There are hundreds of scholarships that do not consider ethnicity or gender as criteria for application. You also have federal and state grants that go to low income students regardless of ethnicity or gender.
I know what you mean. Gays are fine but the thought of *being* gay makes me sick to my stomach.  Sorry guys!
I still have a Windows PC hooked up to a 50" plasma as the main media/gaming computer. Considering that, no the monitor isn't too large!
What contribution does any artform make by itself? Its the culture that goes with the artform that contributes to society.
Is it the pixels that give it away? Have you seen many?
It was the former. It's a little vague. Your links elsewhere are more helpful. Thanks.
That's a great suggestion. It doesn't require lighting fact reflexes or accuracy. But is a gateway-drug to other FPS games.
Ill join you on your quest! YOU HAVE MY SWORD!
forever alone!
In general you are correct, doctors end up being so specialized that its better to have professional rescuers do the work. However in this case, the anesthetist is exactly who you'd want there (that or emergency medicine), running a resuscitation is exactly what they do. To be honest, the lifeguards only did okay as far as the medical care rendered went, to their credit they took care of the essential steps which saved the guy, but there certainly is room for improvement.
no one has that life growing up. 
Or they have him hidden for being a heathen.  Happens to me all the time.
Cocaine's a hell of a drug.
Hipster.
Become a teacher.  I heard somewhere that they don't have to pay into SS.  It's a widely believed fact.
Epic pics of beautiful chicks? try 4chan lol  www.complete-privacy.eu.tc
Number 3 drives me nuts. I get so pissed when I'm capping a flag and people rush up and stand RIGHT NEXT TO ME. They are just begging for someone to throw/shoot a grenade/rpg at us. What's worse is when they stand right in my sector of fire or if they watch the same sector I'm watching.
Thanks for the link, theres a ton of useful information there :)
I'm shocked that an hour has gone by and an Inception pun hasn't broken out yet from your comment.  Not clever enough to make one myself though...
Hang in there, buddy. 
Well, it's just that /circlejerk seems like a damn rude comment.  Also why the hell do you keep throwing /circlejerk and groupthink crap out there?  It's insulting. Why are you casually assuming that because I posted that link that I'm following the decision of some crowd?  Now that's damn presumptuous and trolly of you.  Rivals?  Bullshit.  It's worse.  When these assholes get into office, they make policy based on their bullshit beliefs.  You've got to know how to counter these clowns before they start dictating policy.
the internal combustion engine, is not a "naturally occurring process"...
This insanely annoying thing where I get a sharp pain right where my jaw joint is after I drink whine, beer, something high in acid (once in a looong while it happens with soda).  Heavier wines like Cabernets make it way worse. Usually the best way to deal with it is just chug water, it hurts a bit more but goes away quicker.  I have looked online and it seems not to be super uncommon but nobody has a name for it. It is not bad enough to stop drinking or see a doctor so I just man up.
Terminator 2
A friend of mine became a minister so that he could perform the ceremony for my wife and me.  There were no mentions of god, but we did get a Douglas Adams reference in, which is better.
shrink the columns.
When you're on vacation, you can make all the noise you want; that's why it's called vacation. &lt;citation needed&gt;  If anyone says anything about it just put on your trollface.  *"Problem?"*
re-re-post  circlejerk material ?
&gt;it's objectively better than most countries on most scales   Could you please provide citations for this? I would actually love to see where Cuba sits on an objective quality of life ranking. 
